“My cousins are lucky to have found you. I’m afraid they were getting overwhelmed by the place and had started to let it get pretty run down.”
A couple of months back I received an invitation from Corinna at Ribbon Carousel asking me if I would be part of a new tutorial team. My answer? Heck yeah! I would be crazy to pass up an opportunity to share my ideas with other crafters all while creating with ribbon!
Also, he started out the first 2 days of the week making his bed all by himself. Monday morning when he woke up he immediately made his bed, ate breakfast, got dressed and brushed his teeth all before Jason had to tell him to do anything. We were pretty excited and could only hope that it would last.
(Cooked split-breast turkey breast)
Welcome to My Crafty Picks. This is a weekly post where I showcase other pieces of art made using Stampin' Up! product that have inspired me in one way or another. These inspirations are created by other talented artists so please visit their site for all the details and let them know that I sent you!!
The rosti stack and french toast are worth a try, but while the french toast is a decent size, the rosti is rather small for the price. The muesli that I had was rather average, and not really worth a mention.
The final chapter is entitled ‘….And the best of luck!’ and concludes with the words: ”Success, for any sane adult, is exactly equivalent to doing his (sic) best. What that best may be, what its furthest reaches may include, we can discover only by freeing ourselves completely from the Will to Fail”.
If white South Africans do not realise that, as whites, we are living in the most dangerous country in the World today.
www.franhealing.com/Current-Channelled-Message.html
Sep 25th - Salt Lake City, UT taught by Jennie Black - Open to stores & designers
Santorum: we should either leave or
Me either! I became obsessed with a certain topic and just wouldn’t stop. At some point, fairly late in the process, I realized I might have a collection. I think it took a mentor or professor saying, Hey, you’re working on a book here. Then I began what was a really fun part of the process: what poems to include, exclude, and which poems to put side-by-side. I think that process was very organic for me. They seemed to fall into place within the book, but I really liked thinking about the poems “talking” to each other in relation to where they were placed within the chapbook. Then I found Finishing Line Press and they seemed like a good match for my subject matter.
Hey BCD readers (if you still exists)-- surprise, I'm still alive! And still cooking and eating. Here's a quick post of some recent culinary treats, to whet your appetite for more BCD blogging!
One particular morning when our bathroom was still located in the great outdoors, she woke up and had to go out to the “greenhouse”. She realized as she got up that she had to go pretty bad and wasn’t sure if she was going to make it. She had a pretty steep flight of stairs to go down and realized when she got to the bottom that there was no way she was going to make it without having an “accident”. So she made an executive decision to just step off to the side of the steps and go. She hit a patch of ice which caused her to go down along with her pants. Even now, 25 years later, I still laugh at the picture this paints in my mind. I envision Bambi when he first stepped on ice.
I'm not going to ask either, but I really like that. Been redoing our family room with a beachy theme so this would be perfect!
They are born into this generation of cyberspace. You should see how fast kids scan a computer screen and come up with what's relavent. I have to turn away from them when I do any screen work because they are all eyes. Passwords are power. Mote than once Tio has cracked my simpler 4 digit phone codes. How? He was a 12 year old with an afternoon, access to my phone, and nothing better to do.
McHappy Day® is only one of the many ways McDonald’s restaurants give back to the community. Every single day of the year, ten cents from every single Happy Meal sold goes to Ronald McDonald House Charities Canada.
Those things I've seen, and thought OOOOH! I want that!" like the complete sauna cubicle, or the sony vaio laptop which needs a new battery, oh no. Even if I put in my request seconds after the alert pops up, I never get it.
Right now, at 6 years old, this little boy has been thru things that NOBODY should ever have to go thru. This little guy has been in an ambulance, being transferred CODE 3, while being bagged and intubated due to having had a massive seizure lasting sometimes over 2 hours, over 10 times in his little life. He has been taken by AIR AMBULANCE (helicopter) 2 times due to the same as above!!!! He gets pounded on by a CPT vest machine for 2 times a day everyday while getting a nebulizer treatment due to his chronic lung disease. And if he is also ill because of respiratory infection (which he gets sick often), then he might have to get the treatment every 2 to 4 hours thru out the day, be on oxygen and then get suctioned sometimes down his nose to TRY to help him get all the crude out of his lungs. And while I am doing this, I am having to HOLD HIM DOWN, because he is kicking and crying thru it all and just making your heart hurt because you KNOW it is just so MUCH for this little boy. But after it is all said and done, he will sit up and smile. Our son….he is just such an AMAZING little boy with sooo much strength and such a SPIRIT. And THANK YOU GOD, he is so STUBBORN! It is a blessing…he sleeps with an oxygen monitor on him every night and we are always listening for alarms to go off.
The next Emerald Pointe Board of Directors Meetings will be on Wednesday, May 16th at 6:00 pm and Wednesday, May 30th (time TBD) in the Clubhouse. You are invited to attend if you wish. Attendees are allowed to observe but not to participate in the meeting.
Seriousness is our middle name; Mr. Vladimir Seriousness von Niederhoffentanger. That’s us.
“We live in an increasingly gender-neutral, technological world then how can we believe in a sham like religion.” Except for the temples of Khajuraho I detest them all. Noisy, their air dripping of communal ism and class/gender differences. I hate the priest who fleeces the zombies who visit these places ..zombies for they are bereft of consciousness and self-awareness, yet ambulant and able to respond to surrounding stimuli.
As I mentally and emotionally prepared the week before our parent panel, I kept thinking about the people who were with me and Kevin while I was in labor and as I delivered Aiden. My best friend, LP, came to my side almost immediately, as well as my parents, my brother, cousin, aunt and uncle, and brother in law. At one point, there were a dozen people in my hospital room. And I can't help but wonder what it must have been like receiving that call. My LP calling her husband, who was at work at the time, to tell him Aiden was gone. Kevin having to call his parents out of state, who made the 16 hour drive first thing in the morning to be by our side. My cousin having to call the girls at work to them why I wouldn't be coming in the next day.
A piece of herself is wrapped in everything she writes.
There is so much potential for the Beliefs and Instincts Mechanic for role-playing purposes.
While sitting in the living room I hear Him in the kitchen. I didn't go in there I just figured He was messing about. Well when I finally go in there I see He has food out on the counter and stuff going into the oven.
Thanks so much for stopping by!! Have a great weekend!
- The Federal Circuit has been more active in reviewing patent damage awards. None of the eight largest damage awards have gone unchallenged. While 2 of the cases are still ongoing, none of the other six awards have stood.
She followed the snaking line of children pushing and laughing happy to be out of the classroom for even the few minutes that the emergency drill would take. Gladys looked up in the sky and noticed that it wasn’t the normal clear blue, nor was it even the gloomy grey that sometimes takes over the sunshine in September. It was instead a menacing green. The clouds churned overhead like a bubbling pot of stew. The air had a tinge of cold and the wind had started whirling and whipping.
I started to hear the buzz about Louisa Young's My Dear I Wanted to Tell You and downloaded the audiobook to my iPhone. I walked for hours, completely captured by this compelling love story. Brilliantly read by Dan Stevens (left), the story gripped me from the beginning and wouldn't let go. I was especially in awe of the amount of research Louisa must have put into this. Yet the research never intrudes. It does what it should do, it makes the world utterly real and gave me great confidence in her authority. The plot, too, is compelling and carried me to places I did not think it would go. But what impressed me the most were the brilliant internal monologues, especially those about how the mind shrinks from the agony of protracted battle and shell-shock. I can't remember reading such imaginative and accurate descriptions of a person's interior mental state. Brava, Louisa, for writing a superb historical novel.
They got up and returned at once to Jerusalem. There they found the Eleven and those with them, assembled together and saying, “It is true! The Lord has risen and has appeared to Simon.” Then the two told what had happened on the way, and how Jesus was recognized by them when he broke the bread.
I think a lot of people think writing a sequel is easy, because you know the characters already and how they'd react and whatever, but I was terrified going into this writing process. First off, I'd never written a sequel before. Second, I wasn't sure if I could. And C...how was I supposed to follow up what I, and a lot of readers, considered my best work? I got this pressure that I wasn't used to now swimming in my veins. I wasn't sure where the story would go. I had ideas, sure, but not a definitive ending, and I even wrestled with a lot of the plot lines. But eventually, I was able to just focus on telling the story and upping the ante...which, you know, is kinda one of the rules. If I were to identify the most challenging process of all, after facing my fear of screwing up my favorite character, I'd have to say writing Joel and Aimee. I knew I wanted them in the story, but they were becoming this mammoth complication. I was writing chapter after chapter and for some reason, it just wasn't going anywhere or it just didn't come off "real" enough to me. And if I wasn't buying it, my audience wouldn't buy it either. So I ended up scrapping about 40 or so pages of Joel and Aimee scenes and rewriting them all, going in an entirely new direction. Thankfully, that new direction was found, because it allowed me to discover, with the suggestion of my dad, Kyro, one of the most unique characters in ASHES.
SHE wants to let everyone know she has enjoyed following everyone's Christmas antics and good wishes. The hospital has wifi, but it's v e r y s l o w......and she said we will get back to posting once things have settled down a bit.
also after I did a little more research it appears that Vogue is trying to change the norm as well.
After Pumba’s “hole” incident, she started going into every hole that we came across. I was nervous at first but after a while she just went in, sniffed around and came out. She didn’t come across anything in the holes either and just had a ball tossing the sand in the air. She was just being a warthog, and that’s all I actually wanted from her.
This contest is only open to US and Canadian residents (Sorry!).
The problem with Christian music is that a person listening to it can quickly develop the idea that what Christianity is about is having happy feelings, because people feel happy when listening to music. I’ve noticed that a lot of Christians leave the faith because they have this idealized notion that the world should be a happy place, where no one ever feels bad. Then they find verses in the Bible that are exclusive and judgmental, and they leave the faith because Christianity is too “mean”.
Polite means they stay in out of the way corners and eat other bugs.
3:00 PM Fortnight
Yes there are many of you who are inspired by Al Qaeda and Islam’s command to conduct Jihad against us the infidel who are living on the ground here in Luton & Dunstable and throughout our Nation who are well connected, well organised, heavily armed, extremely wealthy and with a delusional suicidal psychopathic mental illness that makes you willing devil worshipping blood sacrifices to die for your false god Allah in the pursuit of your Jihad against us the infidels of Great Britain and our Judeo/Christian way of life.
It's been more than 10 years since the Brewers Association Recognition Award was presented to co-recipients, but this year, Doug and Wynne Odell and Doug's sister, Corkie Odell, of Odell Brewing Co. are all given the honor. Having started their brewery in 1989, the Odells are well known for their inspiring vision for their company. Their brewery has a co-worker-managed charitable committee to support local non-profits; they offer a profit-sharing plan for employees; and they have supported local homebrewers in their paths to starting their own professional breweries.
23 sculptors
And in a clearing, by a stream,
Director: Harry Winer
"It's just taking the idea of this shoes that have a life of
The current coach of the Bulldogs, Ed Conroy, is 13-47 in two seasons at the helm. Conroy was hired by none other than Les Robinson, who had returned to The Citadel as AD. Conroy had actually been recruited by Robinson when he was a high school senior, although Robinson would leave for ETSU before ever getting a chance to coach Conroy at The Citadel. Ed Conroy is a cousin of Pat Conroy, a relationship that was well documented when Ed took over the program.
What we have here though, is Woodforde's bottled version of this cherished favourite, and I don't mind admitting to being a little bit anxious about how this transition was going to effect this delicate and unassuming delight.
I’m thrilled today to hear reports that only a year and a half after being released, Aung San Suu Kyi has won a landmark by-election in rural Kawhmu and the NLD is expected to win most of the 45 seats it’s contesting.
This particular Mercury retrograde might resurrect old issues with children -- perhaps the care of children, the maintenance of children, the education of children -- something. Life is really stirring the pot here! Another aspect of your life that might be jiggled is old romance! Old flames and ex-lovers are popping up out of the woodwork. This could be exciting or horrific -- depending on how these relationships ended. Some people stay friends with old flames, and some people don't. (You know who you are.) The upside is you have a chance now to finish creative projects or discover solutions to artistic problems or anything related to sports. Work with what you've got!
When I say "unschooling should be available to everyone", I think it's important to note the "should". I also say that I believe every child is capable of being, and deserves to be, in control of their own education. What I've never said is that unschooling is currently available for every individual, because it's not. But instead of saying, as many seem to, that because it's currently not available for every individual unschooling (and freeschooling), isn't the answer (not sure how that logic works), I simply see there being lots of work that needs to be done to make freedom-based education available for all! I feel like that's what I'm working towards, both with local projects I'm involving myself in (and I should point out that the local people working for educational freedom are very conscious of social factors and very involved in social justice work) and the advocacy for unschooling that I do. I see myself as part of a movement towards a far more egalitarian future, and since I think education is a very important part of that movement, and something I'm passionate about, that's what I'm focusing on right now. Note that I say part of a movement towards an egalitarian future. Because I don't talk much about my other social/political views on this blog, perhaps it's easy for people to forget about them, and maybe think that when I talk about universal unschooling I'm envisioning this exact same way of living, only with unschooling instead of school. That could not be further from the truth. I'm talking about entire social transformation, radical decentralization, autonomous communities, etc. And within that framework, I see unschooling as naturally becoming the default. And a good way of moving towards a different way of living is building/creating as many positive alternatives to the current way of doing things as we can, I believe. Showing in as many ways as we can that other realities are possible and attainable. I see unschooling and freeschooling as part of this.
For sure that was the statement that sealed the deal.
Things did not look brighter for CNN in the evening where its shows too posted across-the-board declines: John King USA at 6 PM was down 41% in the 25-54 demo, Erin Burnett Outfront at 7 PM was down 34%, Piers Morgan was down 14% at 9PM, and Anderson Cooper 360 was down 8% at 8 PM and 28% at 10PM. In primetime, CNN had its lowest rated month in nearly two years, since August 2010, in both total viewers (508,000, down 16% from last year) and adults 25-54 (149,000, down 22%). Meanwhile FNC (1.9 million, 395,000 in 25-54) was flat in total viewers from last April and down 9% in 25-54. MSNBC (754,000; 236,000) was down 5% and 9%, respectively.
…is tomorrow! Are you planning to celebrate? There are so many fun events going on – it’s hard to choose just what to do and where to be. I thought I’d share what I’ll be doing…and if you can join me, you totally should!!
A friend at work is a serious House nut (he watched it all in about two days), so I got to watch season 6 less than a week after the DVD was released – Result!
Yes, the husband has not only blessedly turned his attention to that wonderful, magical animal… he has also dedicated himself to studying perhaps the most delicious art of food preparation: braising. Braising, that most perfect of techniques for concocting tender, delectable, melt-in-your-mouth meat. And pig, that meat most amenable to the BBQ chef’s mantra of “low and slow.”
Can you taste it–
What Patrice did on a personal level he did in comedy. His honesty disarmed the audience.
“Marriage!” he spat out in disgust. “Your mother blighted the best years of my life and took me to cleaners int’ divorce court. I pay 500-a-week so she can live in style in Malaga and lie on her back for local Pedros. Get married if you want, but I’ll not throw good money after bad. You’re on your own lad.”
This weekend I felt on top again and it was a shock to the system to get so much attention. I didn’t have my ass outta doors, 0r the worlds skimpiest outfit on so to be honest I wasn’t expecting even a fraction of the attention I got. I’ll be honest; last night I felt beautiful, like someone would be proud to have me on their arm, to show me to mummy and to wake up to me everyday for the rest of their life, flaws and all!
let her fingers trail over her slick, obsidian scales, tracing where they end and where her pale, almost-human skin began. Scutes peppered her shoulders and around her elbows, running down her arms to pool at her wrists like thick cuffs. Her tender breasts escaped this monstrosity, however, and she rubbed her dark nipples, reveling in their untarnished beauty.
I remember when you welcomed my little family into your home one Halloween night. We came trick-or-treating, expecting a package of Smarties or a miniature candy bar. Instead, you fed us homemade chili and sent us home with a loaf of french bread and a plate full of cake. That's how you were--always so selfless, willing to give to the people around you.
Obama’s administration has upheld the Bush doctrine of pre-emptive war, further stripped the American people of their civil liberties, overstepped its Constitutional bounds, gotten into bed with the bankers and the nation’s wealthiest citizens at the expense of the average working man, and has broken innumerable campaign promises, governing in direct opposition to the once-hopeful slogan of “Change We Can Believe In”.
1/4 cup hemp seeds
-I like the 1980's.
And this rasam, is one of auntie's speciality and S's and my favorite too. Now over to our "Killu Milagai Rasam"... Since "Fenugreek" is a main flavoring ingredient of this Rasam, I would like to send this to, SE (Denu)'s Cooking with Seeds:Fenugreek. CWS was initiated by Priya and hosted this month by SE.
“Doctor Who has regeneration at its very core, and it’s what provides the show with its longevity,” he said.
To begin with, let me say that anecdotal stories about the 'penis fish' go back a long way; right back into the early 19th century. However, and I cannot stress this enough, there are no completely verified accounts of a candiru entering a human urethra. In fact the first documented case of medical removal dates only from 1997 ... and many features of that particular case are somewhat problematic. So, let's look at the evidence for and against the story ...
To all my widsters that might read this, know that on Memorial Day, your Anniversaries and every day of the year, I think of OUR HEROES! I think about your families, your pain, your hearts your children and your happiness. For those who have lost a family member to previous wars, my heart and my thoughts are always with you too. Thank you for your loved ones service to our great nation, I am forever in their debt for their sacrifice.
The sun is shining over Surrey!
Because wagons and benders were small, most of life was spent outdoors - a rugged all-weather life, where the fire was the focal point of the Gypsies' days and nights. Indeed the Romany expression for stopping place - Atching Tan - comes from the root verb hatch - to burn, to light a fire. Thus the original meaning of the expression for stopping place was "the place where the fire is lit".
“The next day I felt dreadful about it. I’d asked him about Alexandra Burke and he told me it was ‘early days’.
Favorite song: Sponge Bob Theme
The Tandy range included quite a variety of maintenance products and accessories for audio cassette users in ’93. A Cassette Deck Demagnetizer and Cleaner, priced at £9.99, topped the range of maintenance artefacts. There was also a fluid plus cleaning tape kit at £1.99, cleaning fluid alone at 99p (different bottle from this one), a cleaning tape alone at 99p, a pack of swabs at 99p, and a replacement fluid pen at £1.99.
Grand prize: The most creative-themed list will win dinner for two at 10 different Santa Monica restaurants including Whist, Cezanne and Jiraffe!
Numba 8: They TEAR SHIT UP. Out of my control 100%. I go to what we call "college" this is "school" but for people who are out of the public/private school systems consisting of 12 years. Anywho. These dogs, when OTHER PEOPLE let them roam around my place of residence, find items consisting of shoes, pencils, pens but not excluding remote controls, books, and other things they SOMEHOW get ahold of.
Q: I've been really analyzing how I work as a writer. In addition to writing you are a mom and are about to have another baby (congrats!). So you have and will have quite the juggling act. Can you talk a bit about your writing routine, how you balance things and maybe what you've learned about what works and doesn't work for you now that you have two published books under your belt?
Nothing would have happened if the prophet hadn’t spoke. But see the Word of God creating worlds out of nothing. See the Word of God calling Lazarus forth. See the Word of God do it’s work. And why? “Then you will know that I am the Lord.” This is the revealing God—He speaks and dead, dry, very dry bones are recreated.
So, I dug out these anchor charts I made back in January to hopefully help my cute little strugglers.
* It was maybe a season and a half too late for maximum schadenfreude, but Pete Campbell got punched in the face! Repeatedly!
I think next time I'd try the more expensive option of not shrinking the layout and see how much it adds to the price.
3/11/12 I am thankful for
Well, that’s changing fast.
This is also the subscription that has a really nice reusable box!
A sun as alabaster in the heart of Rome
One final note:
And I kind of point!
Available Recordings, according to FZShows:
This video is a hit on YouTube: the talking pizza scooter. The US-owned pizza chain Dominos has introduced electric scooters, to deliver pizza in Amsterdam. Since the scooters are quiet, they added voice-over advertising as a warning. German speakers will find it especially amusing to hear a scooter saying “Lekker! Pizza!”
I think I was reading a book entitled “The God Delusion” by Richard Dawkins. This debate between Charles Darwin’s theory of evolution and intelligent design has intrigued me ever since I came across it in high school debate. In the book, Dawkins talks about how human beings judge other things by virtue of what they have experienced. He says that the reason why human beings can’t imagine the possibility of evolution is that we live short lives, but the universe has existed for so many years, and this period of time is long enough for random chances to make cells eventually evolve into human beings. This idea stewed in my head for some time. It seemed interesting, but I did not know what to do with it.
From the Alpena County Directory, 2011-2012:
This blog is meant to be about writing, and I commit to 95% of posts to stick to the point of my observations as I’m trying to write a novel. Today, however, I am going to blog about something else. I do not ask that anyone agree with me, or even read it. But today I am moved to voice something that has been hanging on me for a while.
from a warm shoulder.
Going on holiday soon.
His loneliness, though surrounded by crowds. His fear.
I saw a hundred and more step forth from the ranks, but two or three
...then play along with us and post your Curtain Call Color Challenge creation using Mr. Linky back at Stacey's Stamping Stage.
21. Rock Art - IPA. Not on the same league as a Dogfish Head, but it was good nevertheless. A Vermont brewery that I have never had. I am glad I had the chance to try it.
Guilt is very common when we don't want to do something. We tell ourselves that poor Mary is having a rough time with her boyfriend, the least we can do is listen. But if Mary has been having the same problem for six months, with a cheating boyfriend that she won't leave, you're not helping her by allowing yourself to be dragged through it over and over. She may choose to cling to the situation – but you don't have to.
Mayawati has tried to project herself as a Messiah of the Dalits – this she is not, arguably. And not so long ago, comparisons were being made in India with the other messianic figure of these times, US President Barack Obama. While it has been argued publicly by the chatterati that Mayawati is no Obama for she is too confrontational and lacks a unifying vision (and privately, her ‘unpresentability’ at international forums), something else needs to mentioned.
It didn’t come out half bad.
184 6. “What a Difference a Dean Can Make,” National Law Journal, September 12, 1983, p. 12. See, also, Chicago Magazine, December 1982, p. 185, New York Times, September 11, 1983, p. 30. See, as well, Letters to the Editor, Chicago Tribune, August 7, 1983, Chicago Sun-Times, September 1, 1983, and Southern Illinoisan, Carbondale, Illinois, December 23, 1983; Item C-1986(3), pp. 642-43, below. See, for an exchange of letters with Edward H. Levi, Item C-1986(3), below, pp. 599-609. See, also, Item D-X/27/1991, below. sec. II, and Item D-III/19(A)/2000, below. See, as well, Item D-III/19(A)/2000, below
It wasn't until they started blooming today that I remembered having planted double-flowered bloodroot last year. This seems like something I should have remembered planting, but the bloodroot wasn't something I actually purchased. Instead, they were a passalong from "the new guy" at the garden center where I work each spring, and they were generously offered--and hastily planted--in the midst of a hectic busy season.
STUPID SHITTY GAI GETTING IMPALED
What influences are the most important for that album?
Karen Walker is another blogger whom I have followed since my earliest blogging days and will provide some food for thought when you visit her blog Author Karen Walker...following the whispers.
Birth is easy enough. I have no memory of it. Any pain or inconvenience was borne by my mother. I was born in the Elgin Nursing Home – which doesn’t exist any more – at 1.48 in the afternoon. I was called Amit. That is the name that appears on my birth certificate. I have seen the document. It is green in colour.
I just love. Though do you think the look is a bit too twee, not very grown up like. I shall certainly have fun picking out my colours as would like a different colour for each chair. I found a lovely pine dresser on freecycle too, but more about that another day. Do you like freecycle, would love to know your most favourite freecycle item....
Thursday. Friday, and Saturday.
The Flying Saucer - 7pm - Buy the Beer, Collect the Glass: Stone Imperial Russian Stout Snifter
By the time staffing decisions are reached, D&P will have been in place for over two weeks. That is unusual, as far as almost every administration is concerned regarding football clubs.
Walking in this World by Julia Cameron
Trese is a supernatural series starring a female investigator who steps in to protect the streets of Manilla when the police can’t deal with the supernatural weirdness that appears. Produced by Budjette Tan and Kajo Baldisimo, this Filipino book does so much right it’s practically scandalous we haven’t heard more about it here in the UK.
We know that Moshe’s holy neshama left this world when he was on Har (Mount) Nevo, in the tribal area of Reuven, and HaShem interned Moshe’s body in the tribal area of Gad, but the no person ever knew the exact place.
The Watch Tower with bell was a feature in many kirkyards as the place where someone would guard over a recently interred body and ring the bell for help if the bodysnatchers arrived.
The music is traditional, although apparently not slavishly so; Alaoui and the musicians on the album are credited with the lyrics of some songs. (The words to others are by St. Theresa of Avila, the 16th century mystic, and other long-ago sources such as Ibn Zaydun de Cordoba, whose dates are given as 1003-1071.)
It always sits right here
You see, before Alex I was in a long, bad relationship. And not just a little bad, it was throwing things, yelling, cursing and crying bad. He was just a bad man and will always be a bad man in my eyes. We haven't spoken in over 4 years and probably won't ever again, unless we somehow run into each other. Well when we would go visit his family in Ft. Worth (the reason why I hate the Dallas/Ft Worth area) they were mean to me too. His dad would tell me I needed help because I was so queit and shy and that I seemed stuck up because I didn't talk. That I needed to read self help books to have a better personality. Well do you wonder why I didn't talk!? Jerks... all of them. Anyways, because of dealing with this for three years I just assumed all of my boyfriend's families thought I was an awful person. I assumed this of Alex's family too. I tried to talk more and not be so shy when I met them but it's hard because that is me. However, they didn't seem to mind, they just opened their arms to me. I still thought they didn't like me. I thought everyone's parents didn't like me. So when Alex's mom told me her sisters and mom LOVED me and couldn't stop ranting and raving about me I started to cry. Hell, I'm crying right now! It was then that I knew I was a part of the perfect family. I knew they loved me like they love Alex and I had nothing to worry about. It was a perfect moment that I will cherish forever. It boosted my self esteem and just made me feel so good! After feeling that way for over 7 years, it was like a weight lifted off my shoulders!
Released in January, today seemed like an appropriate day to review Dr. Gary Chapman’s newest book – Life Promises for Couples. It’s an interesting book, one that is suitable for those who have been married for years and those who have just started their journey together. I, personally, suggest having either read The Five Love Languages, first, or at least have some idea of what they are.
Who are these companions?
It’s been more than forty years since NASA sent the first men to the moon, and to grab some much-needed funding and attention, they decide to launch an historic international lottery in which three lucky teenagers can win a week-long trip to moon base DARLAH 2—a place that no one but top government officials even knew existed until now. The three winners, Antoine, Midori, and Mia, come from all over the world.
There is a gold light in certain old paintings
8. Merci, We Heard The Marine Girls Songs
oregano/salt/pepper 1 bag split peas
"Remember the Alamo!" I won't even pretend that I'm a history buff (or that museums and National Monuments are the first on my vacation "to-do" list) but when it comes down to it, it's pretty cool to be present in the actual spot where an extremely monumental battle occurred.
It's that time of year again. I've asked some of my author friends to give me their best lines. Below you will find a mixture of great books. If you just have to read more, never fear, I've included the links below the covers.
Cons :
Just a reminder that my Teachers Pay Teachers store will be having a sale starting tomorrow in honor of teacher appreciation week! From May 6-8th everything will be 15% off. Be sure to check out my new Hawaii unit. We had so much fun using it in our classroom!
I always knew you’d fall through and now your proof.
And since I printed my name on the bag, there is no tag or card to worry about getting lost.
Okayyyyyyyyyy
Mr. Ferguson’s bail was set on Wall’s charges at $32,000 with no 10-percent option, and at $10,000 from the Lakewood charges. He was lodged at the Monmouth County Correctional Institution, Freehold, in default of bail.
During my life I have heard a LOT of preaching. I have heard sermons on just about every subject imaginable. Most of the preachers that have chosen the topic of Holiness go straight for the juggler vein and hit separation. Our personal call to Holiness. While it is true we are called to come out and be separate, I want to focus on the One calling us to be like HIM. My God is Holy.
Heaven for men at Angeles City, Clark. Here you can find awesome club, just along the Malbanis Street. We staying at Tune Hotel (also along the street, near airport) , haven't travel to other place except to SM Mall only. But soon we will find a tourist guide for travel for 2nd trip.
If you've got snow, as I know many of you out there do, make the most of it and enjoy it! Spring will come. I promise!
Hmmmmm…that reminds me of a couple of different conversations I’ve had since being pregnant with your little sister. A neighbor told me that I “just need to have faith” about this pregnancy and during another conversation someone agreed with that point.
The state's response to residential robbery has been very slow, according to Burger.
Yes, she-baby is due very soon...and Oak deserves some light hearted fun since this pregnancy has been quite the opposite! Thankfully, everyone is now healthy and happy but it's been a roller-coaster 8 months. So Oak;
The movie is based on famous children’s books written by Daniel Handler. I have never read the books, so I don’t know how close the movie follows them. However, after watching the movie, it would appear the books do not transfer well onto film.
Awww thanks! You're right, you can only vote once. Thank you to everyone who voted for me. I've slipped from the running in the Mommy Blogger category though. :( I've gotten like 200 or so votes. If the rest of you 8000 or so daily readers want to vote, it's not too late. They're announcing the winners on Oct. 16th. The links for the Blogger's Choice Award categories for which I've been nominated are to the right there --->
The roads are getting pretty muddy.
Kelly: Because I’m not a nerd!
“Then you should say what you mean,' the March Hare went on. `I do,' Alice hastily replied; `at least - at least I mean what I say - that's the same thing, you know.'”
The beautiful weekend began with a handmade invitation.
and you cast in your lot with adulterers.
What brings you joy?
A gleaming white Mormon temple crowns a hill overlooking the town and below is a school where locals and Mormons study together. In the cemetery, the modest graves of Romneys have simple stone plaques flush with the ground while elaborate Mexican gravesites are adorned with flowers and large crosses.
A few weeks ago I found the fabulous blog of Jones Design Company and fell in love with several of the tutorials. One of my favorite ones is the ruffle wreath. As I read the tutorial I racked my brain for what holiday/season I could make it for. Last year I made a book page wreath inspired by a different blog for Christmas (which I love and cannot wait to display again this year), and we already have our Halloween decorations out. So, I decided to make it a Thanksgiving wreath. An often (at least in our house) left out of decorations holiday (ironically because it truly is my favorite holiday...I think, Christmas, Halloween, and the 4th of July come close seconds) Thanksgiving is a very wonderful time of year. To me it is the holiday that signifies the thing that is most important to us, family. I am so unbelievably thankful to have the wonderful family around me that I do. And I am thankful just to have a day to thank them...
That true friendship continues to grow,
Lentil soup
Indeed, community development, building relationships with centers of influence and key decision-makers, community outreach, creating and maintaining visibility and awareness for the credit union, and shaping and communicating the credit union’s “value proposition” are all part of business development.
Taking the ‘Austin sound’ to a new level — pure pop rock!Bryan Beck, 107.1 KGSR Radio Austin** open to AMA badge holders only ** space and food are limited to the first 150 people so be sure to get there early
The essence of the piece is that the function that was once called marketing should now be called branding. Frankly, I don't care what you call it. Richard Feynman once talked about a scientist who could tell you the Latin name of every plant in the world. Feynman said that the guy knew nothing about plants, all he knew about was what people called plants.
"Forget about that. Let's just go back."
Well done, Marlies! Your colouring on this project is exquisite! Please go to the tab above and take our blinkie for your lovely blog.
Today, it felt strange like someone took my snapshot of my life collage and used it to formulate the topics for today’s news. I hit tmz.com first. Not really news, but the best and quickest source for all things celebrity and I like to make fun of celebrity. Really, celebrities in this country are our kings and queens and in my humble opinion writers and comedians were born to make fun of the royalty. That’s our job. I like to quickly scroll through that site to see if anything jumps out at me like it did here and here.
3) Less Isn't Always More
7. Push Me Away - Bottom Life
Having read everything, I have made a decision. As a community, honesty and fairness is hugely important to us, and I am so against plagiarism. Seeing the evidence that the victims have shared, I don't condone what has happened and no longer feel comfortable associating my blog with The Story Siren. So I have decided to boycott.
That’s what I need: a broad surface to avoid inadvertently ripping the bag, wood with a touch of malleability to it, and enough weight that the whole thing swings like a dream.
In Birmingham, there will be lefletting on Hospital Way, at the QE Hospital from 12noon, followed by a joint strike rally from 1pm…
From the pictures I've seen, the hopelessness in the eyes of the victims is hard to watch. Especially the children.
EastEnders: Preeya Kalidas (Amira Masood)
I have been hit with both barrels of the shotgun with inflammatory breast cancer (everything I read says "rare, aggressive, deadly") that is also triple negative. Each of these is considered pretty lethal on its own. The pathology report showed that the sheet-like tumor in my breast tissue had left cancer cells throughout the tissue—BUT the margins of the tissue were clear by 1 cm. all around. It was contained within the tissue that was extracted. The report showed "significant" size tumors in two of my lymph nodes—BUT they had not pierced the outer walls of the nodes and were thus contained. The best news and a surprise to all was the excellent response to chemo. Triple negative normally does not respond well at all. So "contained" and "responsive" lowered the odds of recurrence considerably.
The photos were taken in Hungary near to Budapest early in the morning.
I recently learned the Hungarian word for honeymoon, which is Mézeshetek. Translated literally, it means “weeks of honey.”
As for my tenure as a Team Mom, I’m glad I did it. With three kids in Little League, Michael coaching both Joey’s team and the girls’ team, and my being Team Mom, it sure feels like we are a Little League family. It has been nice to get involved rather than being just a spectator. It wasn’t too much work: put together a snack schedule, organize a couple of team parties, hand out fundraiser materials to the team families and collect and turn in funds from said fundraisers, put together a team yearbook page, get gifts for the coaches at season’s end, and send out lots of reminder emails to team families! My least favorite part was hitting people up for money – not something I can muster a lot of enthusiasm for even for a good cause when I so dislike being hit up for money everywhere I turn. The families on our team were nice enough, but not a super cohesive group. Sitting in the stands with the parents of Joey’s single-A team, I notice a definite difference. Not sure if it’s because t-ball families are generally just starting out in Little League whereas the single-A families have been sitting in the stands cheering together for a couple of years already, or what. Anyway, I would take on Team Mom duties again.
And admit them to Paradise which He has made known to them (i.e. they will know their places in Paradise more than they used to know their houses in this world). (V.47:4, 5,6).
Reading about spirituality and matters of metaphysical nature can be fascinating and uplifting indeed, but it isn’t necessary for soul evolvement. The same is so about attending classes or workshops that provide glimpses into the arcane, having a guru or mentor help you understand life’s mysteries, or following enlightenment offered by the “Masters” — the quotation marks are because these highly evolved souls don’t call themselves that. Spiritual growth is each one’s personal experience of living from the heart — that seat of the soul, core of physical viability, and center of Self that sends forth and receives love. Simply, BEing love is soul evolvement.
Unlike The Secrets Of The Lazarus Club, which was a fun, easy read, this seemed to take ages to start going anywhere, and then came to a rather abrupt end. I also felt that the main characters weren’t particulary respectfully used – there was a rather alarming scene with Houdini and a woman who believes herself the reincarnation of Isis, that really didn’t need to be spelled out quite so graphically.
The title of this blog post is a bit facetious - it's not that nobody knows anything, it's that when it comes to writing advice, two people can disagree and still both be right. Sometimes you have to go with your own passions and make your own judgements.
his hand slicing the air above his bald, red head
1/8 tsp of salt
Murali agrees that remake rights have become a likely revenue stream for Tamil film producers today, something which did not exist five years ago. “Post Ghajini, Wanted and now Singham, remake rights have gone up. A successful Tamil film gets a minimum of Rs 1 crore as remake rights. Not only that, Bollywood TV channels are buying the dubbing rights now for a considerable amount (three to eight lakh for smaller films and even Rs 15 lakh for bigger films),” he reveals.
And as I get ready to bake birthday cakes for my (work) birthday partner that I blithely forgot about today , and prepare Finn for puppy school I can't help but wish, as always that the time between work and bed could be elasticised or gusseted or have its seams let out just a little.
The next part was the hardest for me because it required a lot of time and patience. I covered each page with gesso, but because you don't want the pages to stick together you have to wait for each spread to dry before you can go on to the next. At this stage I used a light covering of white gesso, allowing some of the original text to show through.
We have at least four, perhaps five, educational systems — national, national type Chinese and Tamil and religious schools. The fifth are private schools, both with international and Malaysian curricula.
CA-50 Brian Bilbray OK-03 Frank Lucas
Despite her overwhelming beauty, Taylor could scream and put up a fight like the best of them. She did that in Cat but she really stretched her boundaries in Who’s Afraid of Virginia Woolf? I was blown away by this picture with my first viewing of this hard-to-watch drama a few months ago. Not only was Taylor “brave” in gaining weight, sacrificing some of her looks, and playing an older part, but one feels she could rip the screen apart with her staggeringly sharp and painful jabs at Richard Burton, who played her husband and was her husband at the time and again later in her life.
6. Astronomy Picture of the Day -NASA posts a new astronomy picture each day along with an explanation of what viewers are seeing. Old pictures (dating back to 1995) have been archived so that site visitors can explore images they may have missed.
Is your online persona different to your real life persona?
Happy New Year from all of us at Reflections On A Middle-Aged Fat Woman!
I learned the hard way that it is not compatible with my usual range of 104 COE so I just made spacers of some rods, others in less beautiful colors got a new life as garden stakes in my herb garden and a few very shocky ones even landed in the trash bag.
We've been offline for a bit celebrating my 26th birthday. I'm on the back end of my twenties now. At least I'm not a vegan, or I'd look like I was on the back end of my forties.
“Meditation 8″
11. The man who keeps horses lives next door to the man who smokes Dunhill
and the need is not sated.
The Rajya Sabha’s discussion on the Copyright (Amendment) Bill, 2010 was interrupted as soon as it began. Instead, the brief discussion pivoted around the possible "conflict of interest" of the concerned Minister of Human Resource Development, Mr Kapil Sibal (pictured here). This question was raised because Mr Sibal’s son - Amit Sibal – represents the music company T-Series (Super Cassettes Industries Limited), which is a major stakeholder in the copyright industry in India (see, for example, here).
Despite it being quite big, you can stay in your favourite part of Pattaya and find nearly everything you desire near-by. However, if you do want to get around, nothing could be easier. Most individuals just hop on a ‘Baht Bus’. These small open-backed pick-ups can be seen going about the city by fairly predictable routes once you understand the layout of the city.
How much can just $1 buy you today? The answer is a lot if you need to buy your way back into the progressive challenge that is held each fortnight up at the wonderful site Crafter's Digital Arts Center (CDAC). As I have been guilty of dropping of the planet for awhile and I hadn't kept up with the challenges for just $1 I was able to buy my way back into the fun.
Yikes, I did not want to teach a seminar, only give him some advice. So I told him to do some research on line, that there were some really good websites with this info on them, such as the ones below:
Hugs Paula
Ollie was still sitting there with his hand pressed up against his face, when his mother appeared. Not, pushed open the door and came into the room, appeared. Appeared, appeared. Then POOF – gone again. A moment later, she was back; a tea towel in her hand and her mouth open, like she was about to say ‘Oliver; lunch. Go and wash your hands please,’ or some other parent thing likely to interfere with important kid things. Then she blinked out again; leaving a little hint of room freshener behind. Ollie squinted at the spot from between his fingers, and was just about to get up to investigate when, with an almighty WHOOSH, his mother reappeared; this time waving a shoulder mounted weapon at him and yelling, ‘He’s here!’ into a comm unit clipped to the top pocket of her combats.
Easy Peasy Pudding and Pie......up to three entries!
Well done Brigitte. A pity our own RSPCA did not have the courage to speak out as bravely. But then again the RSPCA has been controlled by the marxists for years and they are only ever going to attack farmers for what they see as class reasons. More about the RSPCA later.
In the afternoon we went out to see my Nan Glynn and Grandad Pete (their great Grandparents) to deliver their presents, the Sweetpeas love visiting them. There is something so warming and earthing about spending time with Grandparents. They spent time there trying out Grandads new exercise bike which he got to help him recover from his hip op. Middle Sweetpea watched Laurel and Hardy which she thought was 'kind of funny'. Eldest Sweetpea was fascinated by some of Grandad's scale model boats which started up a conversation about the Marines and the Navy, they then went through Grandad's old Marine photos which were fascinating. Little Sweetpea spent time running around the house with a singing Father Christmas under her arm :-)
Abby Johnson answered my questions and helped me understand that many of the people working for Planned Parenthood believe they're doing a service for women. They may be sincerely doing what they think these women need. It wasn't the accusations, condemnations or death threats that changed Abby Johnson's heart. In fact, those things usually only strengthened the resolve of the people who work in the abortion industry. It wasn't those things that turned her from director of an abortion clinic to pro-life sidewalk counselor. It was the faithful, sincere, loving prayers and friendship offered by the volunteers for Coalition for Life that finally softened her heart enough to see the evil that was going on around her.
“He’s crazy,” his wife, Bimla, says from the next room, near a pile of dusty magazines. “I would never vote for him; look at all this garbage in here. Why don’t you take some of this stuff with you?”
and that is my share for today.
exposed
Total time: 40 minutes
do we hear drums or a pulse?
Unlike sperm donation centers of previous generations, current ones have no genetic or medical requirements. All donators are welcomed and provided with a generous living.
Life is like that also. Once you get the hang of who you are and where you’re going, you can pop some big miracles too!
So if we want to move the way we want
Ribbon: Really Reasonable Ribbon - Seam Binding
to spend her life and herself.
Fast forward 6 years. I have been having a great year, even felt comfortable enough that I had applied to facilitate at core academy for first grade. My husband had been having what we thought was some minor/routine health issues (arthritis, no biggie), when we learned he had a genetic blood disorder that had potential for some pretty serious complications. His blood work was starting to look weird, so he was referred to a doctor who specialized in blood issues. The afternoon he met with the blood doctor, our world was turned upside down. We have since learned that he now has most of the serious complications from his blood disorder, it isn't going to be easy for him to get his health back.
My article is called Emotional Communication and it deals with the way that the communication methods and communication needs of people with aspergers syndrome differ from those of neurotypical people.
So, what do I do? let this chick stick around? wth?
and the extinguished candles of my soul
Usually when a reciepe comes out wrong or different from what I had anticpated, I don’t know where 1 went wrong. In this case, I’m pretty sure I went wrong right here because this particular pan I used doesn’t have a top and so I “covered it” with aluminum foil. Dumb move. It’s really not the same thing but I was trying to imporovise.
I would definitely wear both of these looks but I think that the first look is my favorite. Which is yours?
I've been posting again on one of my (much neglected) other blogs, What We Had for Supper. It's partly a record of the food we eat, partly a resource to remind myself of past meals we've enjoyed when I can't think of what to cook, and partly a place to link to the recipes I've been trying.
For the Mini Tartlets, line the min muffin tin with baking cups, and press the cookie crumbs in the bottom of the muffin tin, and press down with spoon. Spoon filling, over prepared cups, and top with cookie crumbs.
With this extra information it is much easier to get a feel for Lydia, her offences, and her lifestyle. This makes it possible to track down other offences she may have committed – and perhaps to begin creating a narrative of the kind of existence she may have led.
Thursday and Friday, April 19 & 20 at La Buena Vida
Faster and faster they go.
Kate made this one at school. I can think of a lot of possibilities for painting on these ornaments, but the fact that they're glass makes me a little nervous. We try to avoid glass ornaments, in general.
- One thing that makes this an easy apple dessert is that it only calls for 2 apples (rather than the 6 cups of peeled and chopped apples that are required by most apple pies.
Ok that's enough ranting to make up for not having written in 2 weeks right? Coming to the recipe, this is probably the yummiest chilli pickle I've ever had. My best friends mom, who is also my neighbour and like a mom to me, made this the last time I was in India. I could only bring back very little of it last time and it got over in a jiffy. I got the recipe from her, made it once by quartering the recipe and without the right ingredients and it was not delightful, to say the least. So this time I decided to just bring one whole bottle full, clicked some pics and decided to blog it since its definitely a keeper. There's no cooking involved and its super duper easy to put together. I have this with dosa's and parathas and with just about anything and trust me its divine. I have given the exact measurements, but feel free to halve it for convenience sake.
I instantly began to drool at the impending deliciousness.
In vian thy Kate awaits thy comin'!
Percy Jackson has inspired so many conversations. She has even passed some of her knowledge on to me and her dad, her sister and even her friends. We have watched Hercules quite a few times as well and as we watch it she pipes up with flaws in the movie or little trivia facts here and there. Things like;
Can you talk about those obsessions? That essay on Fahey + old spooky blues in Harper’s was great for lots of reasons, not least that it announced in the bio note that you were working on a book about American music—which, for the record, please write that book. But can you talk more about this stuff? There’s a sense, in reading your stuff, of this almost Harry Smith aspect—someone combing through stuff to find a secret history. Does that hold for you at all? Is that something that feels somewhat close?
2010.09.04 Thailand Pattani 1 1 Islamist open fire on two civilians riding a motorcycle, killing one.
And even though we're not looking to sell our house right now (obviously), I still found the article interesting because we are working to update our home to fit our lifestyle and we want to get the biggest bang for our buck when it comes to these updates! Plus, we want to be prepared for the future when/if we have to sell, and so appealing to the most people is the way to go.
The last time I did this, the average was 68. Are agents offering more quickly these days?
The devil wouldn’t go through that thing unless he was drunk. Listen, Pat. You’re the author. I’m the princess. I’m sure we can work something out. We don’t need the Peregrine Portal. Neil is a fine pilot. Have him fly me somewhere quiet. And private. Neil isn’t ready for a commitment. I’m thinking of sending you to a desert this time. I thought you’d enjoy a fling with a handsome sheik’s son.
I really really like soccer because I love the way it goes on and on and there is no stopping, even if some one is hurt and has to be carried off the field! Maybe some added minutes at the end, but otherwise there is none of this going on forever stuff you get in American Football.
But this is killing me. Leaving you, I always cry on the way home. I know I am not getting enough sleep, but there is no way around it. And tonight, with your Daddy back at work, I feel as though I am abandoning you.
Mobile malware has the potential to be even more powerful than traditional PC-based malware. This is because of the inherent traits of smartphones and tablets which almost all include cameras, GPS, constant internet connectivity, and are as equally if not more powerful than the traditional desktop PC we have sitting on our desks at home.
The things he did, the things he saw
The wider issue here, to borrow a term from last week’s post, is that theurgy can’t be done for, to, or by anyone else. It’s up to the individual. A good teacher, or a lodge initiation, can provide a certain amount of help in that process, but the important part of the work still has to be done by the individual student or candidate, or it doesn’t get done. All these things are equally true of the initiation of peak oil: if you’re not ready for it, or you aren’t willing to put in the study and hard thinking required, you’re probably going to drift back into the standard patterns in the social self that tell you that progress is inevitable and the universe owes us as much energy as we want to waste.
Splitsing Wind en zeilen NL
Here it is in its entirety. (Let me warn you though by saying that this is a bit long but I know that you will read through the end because you cherish your daughter/s too. This is a good read for moms and daughters too, by the way.)
My areas of interest would have been very obvious to anybody who has read my blog: Indian history (especially the colonial Raj and Partition), politics and diplomacy. I've been focusing on these very topics during my studies and it has been a wonderful learning experience that has lead to a passion for understanding postcolonialism, nationalism, gender in politics and foreign policy and the annoying habit of trying to slip in the word 'subaltern' as much as I can (as you can see..).
i mean, just *look* at him. he is obnoxiousness personified! stark naked save for that blasted simpsons towel, laughing and doing what can only be described as the worst dance in all of humanity… and he is having a blast while i just wanna put my clothes on, damnit!!
Persian Cucumber: A Tender Crunch
Examples of Cake Books:
From the ever-fertile pen of Afro Leo's good friend Kingsley Egbuonu comes this little gem (thanks, Kingsley, for all your hard work for my blog, says the little lion, I do wish there were more like you around!):
Wilderness Bottle: One simple one was using an empty, cleaned out 2 liter soda bottle (Dr Pepper, of course!). I took Sophie outside, filled the bottle with sticks, leaves, acorns, pieces of pine cones, and anything else I could find that would add noise and color to the bottle. I put the lid back on, and voila! Unfortunately, she doesn't play with it much. It is quite boring after a few shakes apparently. :)
In addition to its naming rights commitment, Barclays continues to play a major role as the co-lead in the financing of the Barclays Center. Momentum for the Barclays Center continued recently when the Internal Revenue Service issued a new regulation that confirms that tax exempt bonds may be used to finance the arena.
On page 1,164 Breivik quotes the Marxist leader Fidel Castro, who has ruled Cuba for half a century, as stating that “I began the revolution with 82 men. If I had to do it again, I would do it with 10 or 15 individuals with absolute faith. It does not matter how small you are if you have faith and a plan of action.” Mr. Castro represents a totalitarian ideology, and although he is a revolutionary Socialist, he has not been blamed for inspiring Breivik.
From Columbia, Gabriel and I rode the buses on awesome trip through the Andes to Santa Cruz, Bolivia. From G.M.I. headquarters there, we flew in their little 4-seat plane to the school in Guayaramerin, Bolivia near the Brazilian border. (I was the fifth person sitting in the middle in the back.) As we flew, I was thinking about how each of the Heavenly Trio guides us.
The Church building is where Christians assemble to receive in depth knowledge from chosen minister/teachers of the Lord. Take your time to choose what church you should attend, for there are many false prophets out there. However, do not let them stop you from gathering. God has a special plan for them. They must answer to God for such behavior. We are not the judge.
The show started The Heat is On in Saigon, which is one of my favorites!
One man got eliminated based on his responding to the phrase”You can never be too rich or too thin” with AGREE and adding “if I were a woman.” Not a grown-up, not looking for a real woman. X! Plus, he was short. And I think my curves are a good thing! He’s entitled to his opinion but I see no need to waste energy on that argument.
I think Tangerine Tango has reinvigorated all of us in the color world. This color is just so cheery, and a little can go a long way. Add a pop here and there, or do it big and sport it in a dress. Aren't all of these accessories so much fun? I couldn't leave off a few of my favorites from tangerine's cousin coral...always a fave. Linking up at Long Distance Loving, check it out for tons of tangerine tango inspiration!
* They feel that the rules at work don’t apply to them
destiny is for you with your eyes sparkling
History shouldn't be viewed
34-Janette G
representations of people) living in houseboats; a Walmart parking lot on a perfect day that turns evil; and an extraordinary hallucination that time travels and slips in and out of seeing fairies and elves in addition to images of real people.
having time alone with my hubby was a little bit of heaven.
-Kitchen cabinets
We are inferior; He is Supreme
And I REALLY liked this one
And then I got mad at Emily Rapp because I felt, in some ridiculous and possibly imagined way, betrayed by her. I didn't think this was easy for her, but I thought that, while prenatal testing failed to supply her with information to make an appropriate decision, she does, after all, know what will happen to her child and she can state unequivocally that her child is suffering. I can't stand in for Robert and announce that he is suffering. Because I don't know that to be true. And she brought up the issue of quality of life, and I was angry that I thought she felt she could say who was suffering and who was not. I worried that if she was comfortable saying that about her child that other people would assume I would be comfortable saying the same about mine.
In any case, we’re lucky to have Thomas’ music on record, as he disappeared not long after his 1929 sessions, & is presumed to have died in the early 1930s. Between 1927 & 1929, however, he recorded 23 sides for Vocalion.
Shortly after that, Paul made an appointment to have the bathtub refinished, and since we had to move the vanity in order for the refinisher to take care of the bathtub, he reasoned that there was no use in putting the old vanity back in its place, or the faucet, or the shower doors. I made certain not to stand around the bathroom to avoid being replaced too, because truth be told, I have a little patina on me.
Penelope Spheeris (The Beverly Hillbillies)
Wynkoop Brewing Company Churchyard Ale
I just got an I-phone and I swear the things I've texted could go down in history as pretty obscene, but oh so innocent. Glad most of the doozies went to my husband and he has forgiven me.
board, and the New York City Council, of what would have been their legal right
Anyway I get a very selfish pleasure from doing it. I get rewarded far beyond what any amount of money could give me. It makes me wonder if I’m missing something, or if Ayn Rand was missing something. It’s a service I provide in exchange for money to live, and for me it’s more pleasurable than digging a ditch or painting a bridge.
TRS update: The Raining Season is in a fundraiser blitz for a new building fund to raise $16,000 we have $9800 left to raise before august 1st. If you would like to donate please visit there website at www.therainingseason.org and click on donate.
1 med carrot, peeled & grated
Beatrice, tell me about your grown unschoolers series, please, and about what's new on your site.
I got to go home. Jim was my little haus frau and waited on me very lovingly. Today, I'm home trying to recuperate. Watching movies set in Ireland. Swayze the Dog has barely left my side. Vicodin makes me woozy. It also makes me sleepy and I've found myself dozing in the middle of emails and blogposts..............
(The Philippine Star) Updated May 30, 2011 12:00 AM
So far, here is the result. If Dad is struck by the tired physician on the Virginia border, he recovers $3.5 million. If he is struck on the D.C. side, he recovers $3.5 million. If he is struck on the Maryland side, he recovers $3,270,000.00.
We’ve seen lots of deer on the estate recently. You can see them at anytime of the day but most often at dusk and dawn. Paul saw a herd of 23 deer in one of the top fields. The males still had their antlers but they’ll be shedding them very soon.
A moment later, he leaned over and said – “But you know, three seconds is a long time.”
Steampunk edited by Kelly Link and Gavin J. Grant
“We have no government armed with the power capable of contending with human passions, unbridled by morality and true religion. Our constitution was made only for a moral and religious people. It is wholly inadequate to the government of any other.” — John Adams
May you experience the pervasive peace at the core of who you are.
But to each his own. I watched Seinfeld back in the day so I know some people like muffins and especially their tops. But with the popularity of the slang term, muffin top, I must wonder what the hell Malt-O Meal was thinking when they produced this product ...
This weekend, at the scene of the massacre, correspondents reported that the “victims were beyond help, with axe wounds scarring their bodies, bayonet thrusts deep in their backs, and skulls crushed by knobkerries or lengths of thick wood.
I chopped up some basil (maybe about half a cup
Spring 2006: Got the idea to write a story about a captive elephant and started writing
choose the water's gentle flows
We're not much fond of rats either but that's tempered by a recent rereading of Charlotte's Web and the snarly wonderfulness of Templeton.
I remember sitting with one of my college mentors, a lovely woman in her 50s with a hot pink pixie cut, months before our planned April wedding. My fiance was already living in California while I stayed in Ohio to finish schools (still the right choice). For two people who hate talking on the phone, it was torture. At the risk of sounding like a love-sick idiot (guilty), those fifteen months of living on separate sides of the country were the hardest I've ever gone through.
Some of the most important skills children can learn are those that relate to effective communication. Individuals who listen accurately, speak effectively, and write well have greater control over themselves and greater influence in dealing with others.
Nevertheless Uruguay supports Argentina’s sovereignty claim over the Falklands and recently co-sponsored a Mercosur resolution barring all Falklands’ flagged vessels from regional ports.
Sweet crumble crust with wholesome portions of caramelised apples.
has darkened to a shade of darker hue?
Drag: Why did you want to be a crime fighting super hero?
If you have followed my blog for a while you will know that my pregnancy was rocky from the beginning and was very scary up until week 16. I quit blogging around that time due to lack of energy and my sanity and have recently just picked back up. January 25th I was 33 weeks pregnant and sitting at my desk at work and started contracting. They were very mild, but they were there and I was just not feeling good. I monitored them for some time and they were coming very regularly at about every 10 min. At this point I called my doctor to make an appointment, but told them I wanted to drink water and lay on my left side first in case they went away. You see I had my first baby shower planned at school for that afternoon and I certainly did not want to miss it. Well it didn't work so off my husband and I went to the doctor. When we arrived my Blood Pressure was dangerously high and I was having regular contractions so he sent me to the hospital to be monitored and receive fluids, all of this worked so I went home on modified bedrest.
Notice that the word noted here in v.9 is a different word. Here the word to remember is not anamnesis but anamninesko. A different word is used, and it is not related to sacrifice, but only recalling. Here is where the focus is on God recalling his people. However, when we get to v. 10, the word used here for an offering is a sacrificial offering. The word that is translated as a sacrificial offering is anamnesis, here the English translation as remembrance. This again, happens to be the same Greek word that Paul uses in 1 Cor. 11:24 and 25, and Luke uses in Luke 22:19, in the institution of the Eucharist. It is not merely about remembering something.
The barman came over, gave me a minute to pull myself together and then asked me what I wanted. I couldn't see a pump-clip on the hand-pull, but the barman explained that it had just been changed and went down into the cellar to make sure it was OK. After washing his hands he then poured a great pint of Scottish Borders Foxy Blonde making sure that the head was perfect, wiping the glass constantly to make sure there wasn't a single drop of beer or condensation on the outside of the glass - serious attention to detail! As I sipped my beer and contemplated the rest of the pub, the barman then wrote the beer name up on the back of a tray (!) and placed it above the till for all to see, and then got the pump-clip from the safe (a serious bank-style safe!, full of pump-clips!) below the till and attached the Foxy Blonde pump-clip to the hand-pull.
- Perfume (by credit card at airport):
I found this cuties pose on the newest Magnolia rubber stamp collection - Princes and Princesses.
I want to choose my best side
You work as a Youth Counsellor, did your work influence your writing or the theme in anyway?
Okay, so here's where I need your help
Prom night is a most important event or culture specially in young generation.Specially girls love to make themselves perfect and beautiful so that there partner can not get a eye from them.on prom night Party prom dresses and prom hairstyles plays most important look in making your personality attractive.
"You must be," said the Cat, "or you wouldn't have come here."
With BookAnd, you design your store, fill its bookshelves with your favorite books, write reviews for them, visit other Bookander's bookstores and add their books to your bookshelves - all at the tap of the screen.
Ellington continued on his own course through these tectonic shifts in the music business. He did not wholly resist trends while trying to turn out major works. The Kay Davis vocal feature “Transblucency” was an attempt to cater to the singer-centric music world. He still performed major extended compositions such as Harlem (1950), whose score he presented to music-loving President Harry Truman, but these works were rapidly becoming reflections of his greatness in the 1930s and 1940s, and not ground-breaking works that rattled the music world back into the Big Band camp.
While You Were Sleeping
Neither can the combat death of a fellow soldier be cited as an excuse to murder civilians. That was precisely the rationalization that the My Lai killers cited in their own defense.
Level 17: Weapon ATT: +17, Accuracy: +6%, Proc Rate: 54%, Deals 211% damage 2 times.
and everyone I grew up with was there
Let me go on record as saying that admitting Joel is right is totally against my grain. Thankfully, he is usually wrong, or I have no idea what the parable means so I am spared the impulse to disagree with the point. But, there are times, when it counts, when he is right. This was one of them.
13. Right to bear arms and any military vehicles of any type (i.e. it is legal to buy a tank or warship, crew at civilian’s own cost). Weapons, equipment and maintainance of weapons will be at civilian cost. The state will no longer fund a police or a military, EXCEPT where insufficient volunteers and militias occur AND if there is a FORMAL threat of war (the real battle will be fought by the media to maintain peace, warmongers doubtless will try to create conditions where funding of military or police is necessary), a census of volunteer/samaritans/retirees (who will be subject to a psyche check to determine the type of weapons allowed) will be taken daily.
I promise, that's the last Jew reference I'll make.
Cover and let rolls rise until nearly doubled. Preheat oven to 350 degrees.
There are over 100,000 publishers in the USA alone. With the exception of the six big boys in New York City and other large publishers, most take direct submissions without an agent. We’re talking well over 80,000 publishers here!
My faith is strong and operative. I refuse to cower in fear or timidity when faced with challenges or adverse situations, but I rise to the occasion, knowing that I am what God says I am and I have what He says I have and can do what He says I can do, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
Let’s start by saying there are a lot of smart people who run our city.
Who is saying this? The LORD.
There's shit out there for sure, and however unfortunate for smaller local brewers a consolidation will doubtless occur soon. With new and interesting powerhouses of British brewing emerging it will become harder to sell dull beer, which to be honest everyone should be happy about. Beer can and should be outstanding and delicious, indifference is not an option.
1 frequent
“We are keeping the wraps on the new car for now and will continue to prepare for next season by testing camouflaged vehicles,” said Jim Campbell, vice president, Chevrolet Performance Vehicles and Motorsports. “We know that Chevrolet fans are eager to see the new racecar and we hope that the prospect of being able to own one just like it will make the wait a little more bearable.”
A couple of EDL kids were arrested trying to get onto the Metro without paying.
this would be the equivalent of allowing japan to build a memorial next to where the ARIZONA lays, in PEARL HARBOR, in many peoples opinion. the government and those on the left loudly proclaim that the iman has a right to do this in our country according to the freedom of religion.
I do not get any joy out of the holidays. What is joyful? Do the kids appreciate all the gifts? I don't think so? Do I appreciate the mess I will have to clean up? Do I appreciate having to cook? Do I appreciate ... I don't appreciate any of it.
Brief Synopsis: The Doctor discovers that the astronauts on a Mars probe have been replaced by Aliens.
It has been interesting to notice that when we find ourselves in many days of stress we now have the ability to present a completely united front. Before Dd, we couldn't do that. I'd try to manage the family dynamics as well as managing him. Now we manage the dynamics together and, well, HE manages ME and whisks me away when it looks like I'm starting to lose my mind. When I try to manage him, I get the "we'll talk about this later" look.
Wind generation has really taken off in the last decade. 5 year old news is out of date.
Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale) is an empty man. He lacks emotion, he lacks a sense of reality, and seriously lacks a genuine sense of humanity. “There is an idea of a Patrick Bateman…but I simply am not there.” For whatever perverse reason, Patrick Bateman is completely disassociated from the rest of humanity. He’s a Wall Street executive that really does nothing all day long, but earns loads of money despite it. He finds many people despicable from his girlfriend Evelyn (Reese Witherspoon) to his own co-workers to the random homeless man on the street. By night, he has a terrible bloodlust that he is slowly losing control of. But the question ends up being – what is reality and what is just pure fantasy? This is a dark, dark journey through the mind of one demented and empty individual – welcome to the life of Patrick Bateman.
But what this post is really about is insuring you vary how you begin a sentence.
Sister: “No, it’s the potato salad.”
Romance is not usually my reading choice but done well it makes an emotional connection possibly unlike any other genre. Realistic romance is truly a slice of life up for inspection.
The final appetizer today comes from a Martha Stewart recipe. Hot Spinach dip is a restaurant staple- all that rich calorie-laden glory hiding innocently in the guise of a vegetable. Still, it was something I wanted to try making at home for a party; portion control is a lot easier when you are forced to share with others. I followed the recipe exactly, using frozen spinach instead of fresh. Here it is:
Dice kept mocking me and I was getting very nervous. I got to pick the fights, won initiative for about 4 turns in a row, and just could not get my, supposedly easy, 8 kills in time. It was driving me crazy.
About 19.64 pounds of carbon dioxide (CO2) are produced from burning a gallon of gasoline that does not contain ethanol. Most of the retail gasoline now sold in the U.S. contains about 10% ethanol by volume. Under international agreement, CO2 from ethanol and other biofuels are not counted at the tailpipe, so burning a gallon of gasoline with 10% ethanol produces about 17.68 pounds of CO2.
"Even after his death from cancer in 1999, David Ackles continues to influence contemporary singer-songwriters with his combination of dark and desolate lyrics, emotionally wrenching songs, and subtle, sonorous delivery. Singers like Elvis Costello have acknowledged a creative debt to him, and his albums, especially American Gothic, have become cult favorites".
Meet our new hamster, I am sure it won't be the last post about her either, she is pretty cute! She is so good when you hold her, but seems to sit the most still with Kyan. She loves her veggies, climbing in her cage, and getting exercise! She also knows her name already and comes right to the part of the cage that opens/closes when you talk to her, letting you know that you can get her out to hold her!
Whatever power we posses now are ours because Allah has willing it.
The pinecones have made the rounds, starting with my Thanksgiving table, but they seem like Winter to me, so they get to stay another season. The figure on the hearth is an ancient relic from Egypt. Not really. I don't know what it represents, but it was in my grandparent's house my entire life and it reminds me of them.
there’s a difference between
On Saturday we headed down to Nexus International School where The Warriors took on the Irish in some WEIRDO version of AFL. There were soccer nets and round balls being used - wow, they sure do know how to ruin a game (in my opinion). It was a family affair for sure, loads of kids and even some dedicated wives behind the barbie cooking a few snags for the spectators.
Hooley
Kate can talk. She can imitate words. She's a smart cookie. Her latest favorite is to learn animal (and some other) noises. These are the ones she can make:
A gray Friday afternoon—too chilly for May it seems, & the afternoon has opened up to a real driving rain—not the persistent drizzle for which Portland is known. The cool air takes my breath away as I hustle between buildings at OHSU, trying to avoid the downpour & get under cover after my weekly appointment; meanwhile, planning my route home, hoping to avoid this soaking rain as much as possible.
Not only is that terrible writing, it’s also terrible research skills. I know some news sites that have yet to archive anything from 2009, yet nobody can find more details? Seriously, journalists, ask yourselves some questions when you write. Who questioned it? How? In what venue?
It is difficult to get a sense of its size from pictures, and especially, looking at it head-on, it’s hard to believe how big it is (for all of the dimensions, click here to go to Wikipedia—it’s 49.1 feet high). That’s why it’s so wonderful to be able to walk all the way around it and see it from different angles. Here is a side view, which, with the ceiling of the great hall, gives a hint of its vast bulk and calm presence.
3 large eggs, lightly beaten
But back to sartorial matters. I have noticed I wear my denim jacket a lot during the summer months and as it happens one of my favourite fashion writers wrote about this recently.
This is the fundamental flaw in the process. Fifa bought into Olympic football on the basis of it being an Under-23 tournament and in that sense it is fulfilling its obligations. There are several flaws, most notably in the timing coinciding with continental competitions. Add into that the younger age of internationals and the feasibility becomes more strained.
He who has the gold, makes the rules ---- Murphy's golden rule.
I'm looking forward to making this one, but have no idea what fabric I will use yet - perhaps I need something new?!
The menu for the brewer's dinner looks pretty good. This is what I can remember:
Zack: There are far too many bands in the Bay Area that are our peers, so it would take me all day to write them all, but there have been some very fast friendships between us and bands like Giant Squid, Triclops!, Hightower, and Orb of Confusion, just to name a few.
Kate Hudson plays Marley Corbett, a successful, wildly funny and flirty advertising exec. Besides a few friends and a loyal bulldog, she lives a workaholic lifestyle, with one-night stands being a matter of course, along with regular breakfasts of Pepto Bismol. Emotions and commitment are generally kept at an arms length. So when Marley learns she has advanced stage colon cancer, it is not surprising that at first she attempts to hide and laugh at it, in order to avoid the grave meaning at all costs.he filmmakers do a good job of including some of the harsh realities of cancer within the film’s cute, romcom sensibility. But this is cancer ultra lite
-0.203705, 100.319872
But the spirit of the tallest hilltop
I emailed this post to him earlier to make sure he didn’t object to anything I wrote about him, and this was (part of) his reply:
I'm not a gardener, but I do love a garden and well manicured garden pots and plantings. Having a full-time gardener is on my life list of wants. These classic looking garden pots from Pennoyer Newman are made in New York from lightweight resign and pummeled marble and rock and then cast. They were amazingly lightweight, yet they claim they won't age or crack if left outside in the winter.
Not a penny.
This gun law is not broken, so why are they trying to fix it? Its not like there is a horrible influx of crime on the streets. Most of the news that is being written about is all behind closed doors. Every now and then a story runs about a complete stranger gunning down an innocent family. This law is being debated for Florida. So, they want the murder rate to be 365 per year? That is exactly what will happen.
the second
Entering the month of May now I’ve nearly been at this blogging thing a whole year. To celebrate I’ve paid my longstanding library fine and got out some Dinosaur/Geology books, and – as a special bonus – I might just remember to post this month’s Acts & Facts. Anything’s possible…
Next to enter our life was Diesel. We found him at a work site and he was the friendliest little kitty. One night we had to stay the night out there in the pouring rain and up he jumped into the excavator smelling like diesel. Shortly after he came home with us. About three years ago he disappeared. I miss that guy. I also miss his ability to kill spiders and mice. I think I miss that the most.
Arguably, we are one of the best-supplied groups in the area. Has that information leaked out somehow? Have we been compromised? Is there an exodus of people on a direct line path to our location?
As easy to pull on as the drunk girl waiting in the bar!
1. Simmer shallots and white wine in pot until dry.
An investigation by auditor-general Terence Nombembe into government officials who moonlight as business executives, found that more than 2000 were involved in tender-rigging and corruption worth more than R610-million.
Educators worldwide are re-evaluating education, acknowledging the importance of Social Values (inclusion, tolerance, diversity), Moral Character (ethical values like fairness, generosity and integrity) and Performance Character (values like effort, diligence and perseverance).
Why do I mention this? Well, because I have been following with some interest the whole ‘controversy’ around Lenore Skenazy‘s recent column and subsequent news coverage/website devoted to the concept of “Free Range Kids“. In itself, it is fascinating that Skenazy’s ideas have generated this kind of reaction – challenging the prevailing cultural norms about child-rearing and parental control (under the guise of keeping kids safe). Lots of people are saying that it is about time for us to get away from “helicopter parents” who so over-protect their kids that the kids never get any real life experience. Just look at the comments at BoingBoing, on her website, or just about anywhere else – she gets some criticism, but for the most part people are saying either that “it’s about time” or “what’s the big deal – this is how most of the working class folks get along”.
Design for change
I harrow the Bad Lands level,
As far as technically proficient genre exercises go, progressive metal supergroups tend to be quite the treat if the proceedings gel at just the right temperature. Talented vocalists matrimonially paired via label dictation or otherwise with hotshot guitarists and other high-profile specialists at their weapon of choice (drumkit, keyboards, etc.)...what more could you be looking for at this end of the spectrum?
Home, where my thoughts escapin', home, where my music's playin'
So when your mind makes a statement that is in opposition to the subconscious belief about who you are it argues with you, with your mind. This is the block. Like a linebacker, the subconscious charges at the opposing team and block's the infiltration. Thoughts in you mind, or who you really are, what spirit knows to be truth is viewed, if in opposition, by subconscious as an infiltration into enemy camp.
missed the game due to work or other obligations = 10,000
I'm 11! Woman is making a really big deal about it, of course, but I don't feel any older today than I felt yesterday. Well, maybe my hips hurt a little more, but that's probably because I've been super busy today.
Remove from heat and add butter and vanilla. Mix again.
Remember that bedroom wall I loved from the Charlotte home tour last month? Although they built theirs around maps, these vintage book pages would work perfectly for a similar display.
Well...That`s all from me today. Be sure to check out the new challenge hosted by the Rubbah Team over at the challengeblog. There are some real stunners so i`m sure you`ll get lots of inspiration to join in the challenge too, lol.
“I myself can look at almost any hemline, silhouette, beadwork or heel architecture and tell you very precisely who designed it first, what French painter they stole it from, how many designers reinvented it after them and what cultural and musical movement parented the birth, death and resurrection of that particular trend”.
OK, I HAVE NOT STOPPED SPAZZING, (REALLY, CAN IT EVEN BE CALLED THAT ANYMORE?) SINCE THE SECOND TEASER WAS RELEASED. AS A RESULT I HAVE SPENT THE BETTER PART OF MY DAY IN ALLCAP MODE. AND I CAN’T SEEM TO BRING MYSELF TO STOP…
I cannot recommend this place enough. It's a wonderful tribute to Belfast, shipbuilders, and the legacy of the Titanic.
A year ago, that would have been my typical prayer on any given day. My prayers revolved around me, my husband, our kids, our problems and our plans. Sure, we would occasionally pray specifically for someone who requested our prayers – but I’m ashamed to say, it wasn’t a regular happening in our home.
I felt that as a blogger I could hang up my Clogs...so to speak.
wasn’t around for previous technology-driven disruptions of industries, but I’m confident that as cars displaced horse-drawn carriages, electric lights displaced candles, and digitally distributed music displaced CDs, to name just a few, the establishments of the day decried the newcomers’ methods and aims and predicted that the new way would inevitably cause The Destruction of Civilisation and the End of All That Is Good. And yet the doomsayers’ predictions have never come true.
Clearly, we need Maxwell Smart now more than ever.
Building relationships comes down to communication, honesty, sincerity, empathy, and silence. That is all you need to know about building relationships. Well ok not all you need to know but these are the core principles of building relationships. The implementation is up to you. It is up to you to put them in to practice in your everyday life. I will talk briefly on each principle and then bring them all together as they rarely operate independently of each other. Later on in the material we will dive in and develop the principles of communication further to include verbal and non-verbal communication but for now we will focus on the basics of communication as it relates to building relationships.
- fullness of palate
Thanks again to Lori Anderson for hosting this blog hop and to my partner, Vonna for all of the beautiful beads she sent me. When I first opened her package, I was excited to see a lovely lampwork focal that she had made herself. I almost never use actual lampwork in my stuff (that is weird though, isn't it?) but I couldn't wait to try. First, I thought I would get out the wire and create a wire worked masterpiece. One problem - I suck at wire, anything beyond the basics just doesn't work for me. So I thought I would make a bracelet. Never looked right - I knew that it had to be a necklace. At one point, I thought I would just make a bail and hang it from a piece of cord, but I knew that I wanted it to be a little more fancy than that. So, what do you do when you are stumped? Keep it simple.
Next up Man Ure!
Being able to carry a story and hold an audience for a long amount of time is a skill, but “long-winded” doesn’t always mean “good.” Nowadays, I’m discovering that there is much more merit in being able to write concisely, but with strength and magic in your words. If you choose your words properly, you don’t need as many of them.
Friel writes this play “looking back” on the Mundy sisters’ cottage, a fictional house contained within the fictional village of Ballybeg to provide a setting for the unspooling of Michael’s memory. Sitting in the audience, however, we take this place as real, and the natural actions, dialogue, and through lines of the characters (doing laundry, cooking, washing dishes, etc.) further ground us in that reality.
Now I want to talk about the power women don’t realise they have over men.
Happy Tuesday everyone! I hope your day was very productive. I am linking up with Blog Hoppin' this week and today is Teacher Talk Tuesday. I will try to offer my best advice for new and returning teacher alike.
I won't be weighing in, taking measurements or pictures this weekend. So no 19 month measurements or pictures but will do next month. I am just not ready to see the scale yet until this bloating issue goes away. I have been staying on track this week big time and working out and I know the number I would see wouldn't reflect what it truly is thanks to the lovely constipation and bloated like a whale fun.
This is how I feel...
I hope you all had a lovely Easter break inspite of the English weather letting us down big time. Hasn't it been cold, Brrrrr? Still, maybe for us crafters it gave us a bit more time to play and although we had a houseful most of the weekend I did manage a bit more time than of late in my craftroom and made a couple of extra pieces for the Snazzys DT blog. The Prima Almanac Collection we have had to play with this month are lovely and I think I might be hoarding the few pieces I have left, lol!
Fresh from being nominated for the "Breakthrough Artist Of The Year” Award at the 2008 New Zealand Music Awards - an annual awards ceremony being the New Zealand equivalent of The Brits - the band will be returning to the UK to begin the second half of their current tour as part of the "Freshers" tour.
We are also told:
Every single woman I have ever dated even for a brief period of time has THAT friend. THAT friend is that one friend every woman has that is, simply put, BAD NEWS.
Brodsky: Has ESDC considered use of eminent domain.
Lee Hamilton is a small town HR Manager whose pedestrian life is only buoyed by his long-standing friendship with five old college buddies, the Knights. That all changes when he receives a phone call informing him that Steven Ebe, one of the Knights, has been found beaten and left in a coma. The group’s old motto comes rushing back -- you mess with one Knight, you mess with them all! Ebe is a reformed hacker who recently went to work for a private detective agency in South Carolina. Dianne Williams, the manager of the detective agency, surprises Lee with additional info explaining how her entire workforce has been sickened by some form of poison. Rallying around their fallen companion, the Knights join forces with Dianne and discover a series of numbers found in Ebe’s possession tied to a large scale cybercrime. The mystery deepens when the numbers are also linked to a Columbine-style high school shooting in Virginia?
Oh! And the absolute best part! Location was a huge plus, the total main reason for the switcharoo project, but we also created SO much extra kitchen shelving and storage by going to the new closet and snagging some over the door storage, that I was able to completely empty a full lazy susan, into the new closet!
And that is worth the whole journey.
Mioara Merié, Ph.D.: Dr. Merié received a Ph.D. in the Philosophy of Science from the University of Bucharest in1993, and a Ph.D. in the History and Philosophy of Science from Notre Dame in 2005. She has also done additional work in Physics and Peace Studies in Romania and the United States. Having taught at the Secondary and University level in both countries, she is a Political and Cultural Analyst and an Independent Historian. Extensively published and a frequent Conference speaker, in 2005 she was the Winner of the Notre Dame Gender Studies Competition Award, with the paper “From the Afterlife to Life: Feminism and ‘Spirit Drawing’ in Victorian England.”
For those who didn't take the reference/link plunge, I now ram this down your throat:
My Spot Remain
So they're well ahead of the goal for minorities, while behind for women. That likely has something to do with the difficulty in signing on with unions, but, again, the compliance monitor might help explain this.
(also found that cool driftwood on the lucite coffee table! not a thrift store find - it was a Marshall's snag.)
COLD TOILET SEAT!
It also wouldn’t bother me if I were getting pulled over by these guys.
Create a sense that people do things with scant regard for others. That ongoing sadnesses are borne and then encompassed. That people stay in relationships when they are unhappy, until they don't know that they are unhappy anymore.
“A gang of hooligans attacked us. Our noses are fractured and our bodies are covered in blood. My friend’s cheekbone was crushed. They attacked us with glass and burnt us with lit cigarettes. My face is burnt and totally disfigured! Worst of all, I really hated their racist comments.
can not defend your argument…
A march with posters and chanting will begin at 3:30 p.m. around the campus, and teachers will read anonymous statements from their colleagues about their experience, said Ingrid Villeda, chair of the United Teachers Los Angeles South Area, which includes Miramonte Elementary School.
and oh! so soft
Proton’s net profit fell 76% to RM15.6 million for 2QFY12 ended Sept 30 from RM65.9 million a year earlier due to higher expenses incurred by Lotus Group.
Why does PETA, whose motto claims that animals are not ours, and presents itself as an “animal rights” organization, promote a philosopher who rejects animal rights and strongly believes that it is morally permissible to exploit animals? This is the core contradiction that lays the foundation for most of the other contradictions that we will explore in this essay.
The Customer is:
So I’m going to talk about how me and my main character, Luke Kincaid, are both alike and dislike.
But Oliver is here and is gentle and quiet and housebroken and friendly and atrocious on a leash. Atrocious, Readers: so incredibly bad... Basically like putting a cat on a leash and expecting it to go in a straight line.
Crisp topping:
This stamp is titled "Mimi + Friend". The papers are from K+Company and Recollections. The sentiment stamp is from Some Odd Girl's "Gwen In Bloom" set. The flowers, ribbon and brads are from my stash. I colored the image with these Copic markers:
In large bowl, combine 1 cup sugar, margarine, milk, vanilla and egg; blend well. Stir in flour, baking powder and salt; mix well. Cover with plastic wrap; refrigerate 1 hour for easier handling.
If there was hidden treasure, nothing would deter me, be it day or night, rain or shine! It boils down to what I consider of true value, is the pursuit of God my ultimate goal?I would like to say a resounding yes but, sometimes the fruit of that would not align with my answer. Intent and potential do not take you far in life but it is a great starting block.
When it comes to short stories, I prefer a simple process. Whenever the muse whispers the idea in my ear or I think it up out of thin air, I rush to write it down before it goes away. Because of day job or other obligations, I really can’t sit and write just whenever I hear the voices. I do pay attention, make little notes, but it is until the dead of night, in my study, where I put pen to paper and write the story. In short stories I don’t plot for long, I just go with the flow.
No matter how much you know, earn or have, life is about getting along with others
3. Avocados, .49/ea. at Sprouts and Sun Harvest (through 12/8/10)
Unfulfilled because instead of waking in the morning and meeting with my creator...I log onto Facebook.
The procedure’s defenders point to the extremely low number of affected children, considering the the high birth rate for Orthodox families and the number of ritual circumcisions that include metzitzah b’peh. Between 10 and 15 children have been admitted to hospitals in the United States, Israel and Canada with the disease in well over a decade.
to the moon and angels up on high
Again, I do appreciate a well-argued case that this is not what is likely to happen. But unless we see a multi-year recovery economy in which the nagging debt and default issues are entirely removed, economic nationalism will return with a vengeance.
Taking Craig’s criticism onboard, Schieber refines his original argument. The refinement accepts that there are two kinds of intention — prior intentions and intentions-in-action — but adds further complexity to our understanding of intentions by focusing on two different kinds of intentional content. They are:
They found the Reaper waiting in the pale moonlight.
First of all can I just say how much I disapprove of the UK cover! All the other ones rock and this one... bleughh. Though, I AM DYING TO READ THIS! Did you guys realise long we had to wait to read this book! UNFAIR. So, I really have to read this, quick, quick, quick to see what Cammie gets up to next!
#11. GCB- it's my newest obsession and one hilarious television show
4. Travel Agent
Now I’m a cereal person, when I do eat breakfast, but I know my way around the kitchen and I know that reading and pouring a bowl of cereal can be done.
Why doesn’t Neil take Keating’s advice? It’s not terrible actually. Take your shot by talking and if it doesn’t work out, wait it out. This is a common problem of the depressed: the sense that things can’t ever change.
1 stick butter (salted or unsalted, will need to vary salt quantities depending on what you use)
The tricolour in the canton of the Orange Free State flag is thought to be based on the tricolour which was used at Swellendam & Graaff-Reinet where the first Boer Republics were declared in 1795.
A couple weeks ago, I received a little surprise in the mail from Foodbuzz's Tastemaker Program! A coupon for a bag of Ore-Ida Sweet Potato Fries! Along with the coupon was a letter from Foodbuzz asking me to make something delicious with them! I thought long and hard about making something spectacular and outside the box. However, since the fries are meant to save you time, I decided on making something simple instead, using store-bought ingredients.
The rest of the morning I spent digging over the plot which has now all been dug apart from the patch of parsnips and PSB left. I’ll dig in some well rotted chicken manure and I should then be ready for the new season.
Since the 1993 release of the film Groundhog Day, starring Bill Murray as a TV weatherman (who wakes up and it’s Groundhog Day over and over again!) and Andie MacDowell as his puzzled producer, attendance at the real event has expanded. In 1997, there were 35,000 visitors in Punxsutawney, five times the Jefferson County town’s 6,700 population.
STOP AND GIVE PEOPLE A CHANCE ... CHEER FOR YOUR CHILD AND WISH THE BEST FOR THE OTHER CHILDREN PLAYING ... There will always be a loser and a winner at the end of a game, but we can all be winners if we show kindness and grace after ...
DAL
I have covenanted with my Lord that he should not send me visions or dreams or even angels. I am content with this gift of the Scriptures, which teaches and supplies all that is necessary, both for this life and that which is to come. - Martin Luther
until... TODAY!!!! I was super-surprised!!!
It’s basically about a girl, Katniss Everdeen (the bad-ass), who lives in the future, totalitarian, post-apocalyptic America which is then called Panem, and how she survives the Hunger Games, a sadistic event devised by the Capitol (the government) to remind the people of the Districts (similar to states) that they lost when they first rebelled. Children are randomly selected to participate in the Hunger Games and must fight to the death. The last one standing is crowned victor. Two children are chosen from each District, a boy and a girl. Katniss is poor and has taken over as the head of the family after her father died and her mom fell into a deep depression that rendered her helpless, for a while. To support her family, Katniss turned to hunting. Good thing she did because those hunting skills came in handy while she participates in the Hunger Games.
Pride is on full display in Las Vegas. This sin is really at the heart of the Las Vegas experience. There is no sadder site than a bachelorette party where the bacherlorette in question wears a plastic tiara, drinks out of a gold plastic goblet encrusted with bling that spells out “Bachelorette” while kissing her girlfriends on the lips to the delight of all male passers-by. The bachelorette is the star of the show, and the afternoon I observed such a group poolside, any whim experienced by the bachelorette was to be fulfilled. Behaving as though in one of those ads on TV, the gaggle of girls faux-dirty danced with one another, taunting males with their girl-on-girl kisses, exagerrated outbursts of “Whoooo!!!!” and other activities which appeared pointless from my point of view, but surely stoked their imaginations as being celebrities and fabulous for a day (or afternoon).
The equation outlines the scientific principle behind being a successful writer and has been proved for centuries. And while the equation is not complicated, it IS true. And over the years I have come to call the equation Monteleone’s Theorem.
So why did we log that many miles on the road?
Pep cited exhaustion as the main reason behind his decision. He gave his all to the team in these last four wonderful years. He's empty now. He has nothing left to give. Like someone mentioned on twitter, the guy aged ten years in the last four!
are mocked by the heat of our passions
26 TO fly a kiwi fruit from New Zealand to the UK means five times its weight in greenhouse gases being pumped into the atmosphere.
Worsening credit conditions have also increased the cost of insuring Indian banks’ debt. Spreads for SBI’s five-year credit-default swaps have widened more than 80 basis points this year to 245 basis points as of this week, the widest since July 2010, according to data provider CMA.
KATRINA KAIF – 3 crore for Dhoom 3
I shared this recipe at:
never to age, always joined
James
He has the tone and tenor of a salesperson.
Very little is known about who wrote the Gospels, or who in fact did write them. (for example most scholars believe the Gospel according to Mark wasn’t written by Mark but rather some unknown person, same story for the rest of them). There are many contradictions between the Gospels, for example Mark makes no mention of the virgin birth, the Sermon on the Mount or the Lord’s Prayer. It seems unusual that such major events in the life of Jesus could be ignored by someone who allegedly witnessed them. The Gospels contradict each other on Jesus’ ancestors and numerous other places (too many to mention here but a possible topic for a future post).
Wait – what? 21% believe oil is more important than water? I’ll grant you that our society is highly dependent on fossil fuels. It’s a parasitic relationship that, like it or not, affects and involves all of us in some way. But our planet has existed for billions of years and humans have existed for tens of thousands of years without petroleum. Without water, our planet as we know it wouldn’t exist. This basic lack of knowledge about the world we live in is an alarming indicator of how disconnected we have become from nature. Because to understand nature as in any way separate from or subservient to us is to forget how to live. How to survive.
The following is a comment I placed on Craig’s blog regarding sozo. I wanted to share it here just to reiterate the truth –
He thought about what I said. The way he does now. And came back to me saying how when he shut down it was a decision he made. He actually thought to himself I'm going to shut down. And he told me that he thinks that is progress. Instead of just doing it and feeling it he thought about it and it was a decision. Since he can make that decision now,next time he will recognize it and choose not to shut down.
I was taking William to football practice the other day, and I heard on the radio about a product (I refuse to mention the name) that allows people to make their own soda. The announcer was just RAVING about this product and how it will save the planet from all the bottles and cans using it will save.
Best Tri Mode EX Twin Stroller Set in Candy Apple Color: Candy Apple Collections
5. Blog
The headline bout of the night featured former title-challenger Cherry matching up against the experienced Martinez. The 29-year-old Cherry was looking to build on his February victory over Guillermo Sanchez at the UIC Pavilion as he continues to rebuild his title chances after his 2008 loss to Timothy
2) The Little Prince by Antoine de Saint-Exupery (1943)
I totally agree so now when i go to houses where babys have been born i always ask about baby of course but then i always look into the mums eyes and ask her how she is feeling!!!!
Mirror horizontal
One big lie,
I have in my heart, the times you spent the night at my home.
when day turns to night
Wedding Favors: 喜喜 Heart Cookies
A must-read for anyone interested in knowing about food safety, food poisoning, dangers of uncooked meat, the 1993 account of the 'Jack in the Box' outbreak and the industry's wake-up call.
I think that if I become a better wife, in turn I will be a better Christian. If I become a better Christian, in turn I will be a better wife. I will continue to try to do both and with God's help, I will continue to grow as a wife and Christian.
An artist’s impression showing gas from a tidally shredded star falling into a black hole. Using several ground and space-based telescopes, a team of astronomers led by Suvi Gezari of the Johns Hopkins University identified the victim as a star rich in helium gas. The star resides in a galaxy 2.7 billion light-years away.Picture: REUTERS/NASA/JPL-Caltech
Writing goals
Since starting on the slop about four weeks ago, Lumpy has scoffed (in no particular order) banana, porridge, banana porridge, parsnips, carrots, sweet potato, butternut squash, sprouts (bleaggh), spinach (surprisingly yum), mashed potato, four-grain cereal, apple, pear, blueberries, cheese, yoghurt, fromage frais, leeks, peas, haddock, turkey (come on, it was Christmas. Everyone had to do their turkey-eating duty, and being a baby was no excuse), bread sauce, strawberries, basil, parsley, a tiny bit of chip, a crumb of chocolate cookie (really not that impressed), and avocado (ohmygod avocadoavocadoavocadonomnomNOM).
Very nice to work with...not as smooth a yarn as the handknit cotton, but not as splitty as the Milk Cotton. I have been using sock weight yarn for such a long time, that I had forgotten how thick aran weight is! It works up very nicely and quickly, and I would buy it again if the opportunity arose...
Over the next week, the manager graciously came up with some solutions, but it was all dependent on someone renting out our old apartment. After the anger subsided, I realized that I was not in control and that I really had no choice but to either trust the Lord or lose my mind worrying. I decided trust was the better answer. About half way through the week, the Lord changed my heart from being irritated at the management to love. Steven challenged me to pray, not only for the situation but for the manager. So we began to pray that God would bless them and make them prosper. And you know what? It didn't change our situation one bit. We are still currently paying for 2 apartments praying that someone will rent out our old apartment. Do you know what it did change? Me.
Alfa is the popular 4-rings butterfly which is the upper one of the two. I modified it slightly by tatting a head for the butterfly with a SSSR which is also to tidy-up the ends, instead of tying a knot. I also used the SSSR to finish the ends at the head of Birte which means that I had changed the starting point when I tatted it.
Despite an unpleasant Friday, I have enjoyed a nice break from work/life. I am now armed with a new plan and ready to tackle next week with all pistons ablaze!
You can't get fired for no apparent reason.
Part two. Again, I get impulsive. I hear that my mom knows a lady to just LOVES to cut hair, plus she's good. This sparks the idea in my brain. I didn't really want to pay to get my hair cut anyways so I take a chance. My hair is long, heavy and brittle at the ends. I've really just had it with styling, straightening and dealing with it, period. I'd gotten into the bad habit of just wearing it up because I couldn't be bothered. Plus, showers took way to long. But I wanted to ease into it. So I had her cut off 4 inches.
"Queene Elizabeth of famous memory did more desire it than any other herb to strew her chambers with all"
Shahrzad is a new restaurant which is still getting the kinks out on service and finalizing its menu items, but I encourage you to stop by, especially if you’re looking for something really different.
It is quite effortless to make problems when striving to offer with lookup motor optimization. By only employing established tactics you ben increase your rating with no currently being blocked.
Obama promised that the U.S. would work “to phase out fossil fuel subsidies” and promised “historic investments in renewable energy” and his intention to put Americans “to work increasing efficiency in our homes and buildings; and by pursuing comprehensive legislation to transform to a clean energy economy.”
Maybe her great grandfather cheered her on from the corner.
And, like anyone who's ever inspected the writing on a bottle of shampoo while they poo, you've looked for some words to read to occupy your mind and pass the time.
“You can still lose weight and eat everything you want”
One time, my cousin was driving to work in the early morning. An owl skimmed the windshield and roof of the pickup he was driving. His father, my uncle, had been quite ill, and so his death a few days later was not completely unexpected.
This is easily one of my favorite dark Italian wave records. Both sides of this 7" do a perfect job of blending male and female vocals, as well as synths and guitars. Very catchy from start to finish. Enjoy!
Jessamine. Oh Jessamine, Jessamine, Jessamine. She’s a bitchier version of Isabelle. Again, I don’t like her. And well, Tessa? I’m sorry but, I didn’t get her it at all. I really don’t know what to say about her.
Palm served on the City Council and School Board and as Postmaster. He was an insurance agent, chief clerk at the State Treasury, and the meteorologist for the Texas Geological and Agricultural Survey, read at least five languages, and was an amateur archaeologist. He worked to set up Austin’s public water system and helped found the Swedish Evangelical Lutheran Church.
I thought I would share the recipe with you, It’s lovely with tiger bread. Enjoy
Here’s my attempt.
The lives you live are but fake,
Another bad point about the snow, we really need to get some food into the house if we plan on eating in the near future, and it seems unlikely that our car is going anywhere, so I suspect I will be braving the cold to walk to the supermarket on my own. This of course if the general public haven't panic-bought the whole of Morrisons in the last 24 hours, I didn't really think it was going to snow in the South West so did no planning for the conditions at all.
Tomorrow is Small Business Saturday, a day dedicated to supporting the small businesses that make our neighborhoods unique and neighborly. You'll get expert and helpful service that you won't get in the big box stores, and you'll be keeping your money in the local economy. Neighbor-lujah!
I stretched out my hand to shake Joel and Alain's hands, but they just reached out to share a hug ~ they too already knew me through Chris. It was immediately so comfortable.
"Not all things in this cosmos have, nor require opposites. Love is 1 of those things that springs up without antecedent or opposite. This may seem facile, but it’s true. Love simply exists."
They were huge back then.
He also said he still believes that the decision to send British forces to intervene in the civil war was the right decisions, because Sierra Leone’s fledgling democracy was at risk from “a group of murderous thugs and gangsters”.
So like a literary Saint Paul on the road to Damascus, my eyes were opened. My slow slide towards the purely digital lifestyle has been upended by this one thing — this slim, six by nine manifestation of my literary labors.
Unlike other plastic drink-ware on the market, Tervis Tumblers® are as clear and brilliant as glass… allowing for the greatest display of emblems and designs in the tumblers.
Also, everyone is encouraged to cross over and explore other mediums, so we have poets taking acting classes or playwrights sitting in on children's lit electives or poetry readings. The cross-pollination is rich and provides for a truly unique creative experience.
Your turn. Have you ever done something like this? If so, please share your expertise with us!
Water crackers, pita chips and apples slices for serving
First recorded as the Cailleach Bhéarra of the Beara peninsula in southern Ireland, she was once revered across Ireland and Scotland. Commonly associated with wild nature and landscape, in the Western Isles, the Cailleach is credited with creating Scotland’s elemental fringes (including the Hebrides).
The catch is, you cannot use the title of the film at all.
Today I am thankful that it is the last day of November!
By Nan Schichtel
From this background sketch you’ll perhaps have gleaned that Cooper, who speaks like a cowboy, conducts himself with the courtesy of a gentleman rancher, and has experienced something of the bohemian life as well as great personal loss, is a world away from the deceitful but otherwise straight-laced FBI man Robert Hanssen. Cooper describes his own politics as ‘left of left’. Sayles, who most recently cast him as a dimwitted politician and thinly-disguised pre-White House George Bush in the political satire Silver City, calls him a news junkie.
Ambassador of Finland, Mrs Sofie From-Emmesberger “was happy to see the guidelines of Finnish Foreign policy concerning children’s rights put into action in Nairobi and hoped that the project would get visibility outside Kenya”.
But this post isn't about the Terrible Thurman Truncation of '10. It's about a possible solution to this problem, and to other problems, such as discussed in this post.
I do understand no-one likes to have their hair pulled, "you'd be mad too," is what my attending nurse said! Poor Prince freaked out...while in my lap, he snapped at my left hand, leaving two puncture marks over, and under my left thumb (can't bend my thumb;ouch)....I did get the snag out of his hair, and when I put him down, he freaked out even more, and bit my upper right hand, quite deep, and tore the skin to almost two inches...looks like a #7 nasty infected scar now!...the worst part is, that both my hands been inflamed, and swollen...getting better now with strong antibiotic, and antibiotic heavy cream!
How Original is Original?
Troegs Nugget Nectar
This is such a small amount of money that it is clear that there can be no reasonable objection to a surcharge to enable shore power. After all, no one has to take a cruise - but the residents of NYC have to live with the pollution.
Now, I’m just a little anxious about this 10pm alarm of yours. Is there a way about this? Of advance not, that’s a asinine question. I'll yield affliction of it. Annihilation fun happens afore 11 anyways. Speaking of fun, I’m academic I’ll accept to breach over. I’m abiding it’ll be no botheration for me to crash, right? I know, you’re apparently a little afraid because of the accomplished animal assault/rape allegations that landed you in bastille recently. Just to be clear, I’m not some Swedish aggravate who cries abduction afterwards I accord to something. I’m Canadian; we about even apperceive what “consent” means.
Sadly, the advertising lets the magazine down though, with lots of quarter page adverts it becomes difficult to read and quite frankly, last time I checked, ‘hair loss’ adverts weren’t really relevant to a holiday reader?
“People think in a very critical way before they come into this Church. When they come into this Church they’re expected to conform. And they find happiness in that conformity.” — Gordon B. Hinckley
Why is it worth your while to submit to our contest? The obvious answer is that the first prize winner in each genre will recieve a publishing contract for the submitted winning work. Your book could be the next winner to be placed on bookstore shelves! Of course, there are also second and third place prizes within each genre that are targeted at authors who are prepared to publish. These prizes are to help you get there.
Preheat oven to 200°C / 390°F. Arrange pears over the base of a heavy, ovenproof frying pan (cut sides up). Place sheet of pastry over pears, and trim. Brush pastry with caramel sauce from original pan.
The above mentioned things are definitely a huge part of a writers job but when you are starting out, when you do not have 120 original stories/novellas/novels behind you, the most important thing is to write NEW WORDS.
love shows the worse in people
What a happy coincidence: to be reading Tomas Transtromer the week it is announced that he has won the Nobel Prize for Literature. If you didn't know much about him before there's now no shortage of articles on him and his poetry popping up all over the place.
Hi, I was born in 1963 on September 18th at 6.45 am to an extremely dysfunctional family, in Teddington, Middlesex. If it hadn’t been for my totally batty but wonderful mum’s love I might have shrivelled up and died. But she adored my brother, sister and I and although she did a terrible job of keeping us safe, she made us all fell very loved and special in her own way.
In a bid to end their relationship, Saravanan closed the shop and returned to his native village U. Pandiapuram in Tirunelveli district along with his family. However, Elango remained in constant touch with the girl. Enraged over this, Saravanan invited Elango to a place near Munnirpallam for talks and took the help of his relatives to murder him.
2 Timothy 4:2:
Food Sources, Supplementation, or Tanning?:
4. Leaders rise above the limitations of their character. Character will either limit or support a leader, depending on it’s strength. It will always determine wheather a leader finishes well.
Registration Process
Don’t drop that
It was still quite early when we got there, about 6PM, so the dinner crowd had not yet arrived. We chose a seat facing the glass wall, so we had a view of the happenings outside. Anyway, on to the menu. They really did have a mix of Asian and Western.
I stretched out on the futon, dangling
Anyway, the Four Trackie Fools acknowledge that they were somehow transported into the future and can’t figure out how to return home. Since the rooftop house was their entry point, they decide to make it their home. How about you check with Park Ha first, dudes?
Then DC happened. And I remembered.
Very simple and very healthy
shaking their head in admiration.
K8 Hardy - Like a pair of 12 year-old boys at spring training me and my friend Aimee ran up to K8 Hardy after a lecture and demanded that she take a photo with us. Since we are not 12 year-old boys and this was the Great Hall at Cooper Union and not spring training, K8 looked appropriately weirded out. She did take a photo with us though!
The following morning Francois will pick us up after breakfast at the hotel to take us to his favourite market where we will shop for the dinner he will cook for us that evening. Once our shopping done, we will go to La Crèmerie which will be booked for us only for a picnic lunch made up of amazing French products such as boudin en terrine, excellent hams and cheeses with salad and grilled vegetables. Again Francois and the owner of La Crèmerie will devise the menu and wines.
Although now she lives in Hawaii with a herd of goats on her farm, her identity, artistry and soul is still deeply rooted as a Canadian Cree woman. She expressed warmly her eagerness to perform on “home turf” of Canada, particularily in the prairies since she was born in Saskatchewan. Her heart and allegiance to her aboriginal identity, shone through her song with pow-wow dance imagery, Love Still Goes On and On:
Dr. George H. Elder has a Ph.D. from Penn State in Speech Communication and a Masters Degree in nonfiction Writing from UNH. He also has a very eclectic work and personal history. He has been a college teacher, custodian, upper-level scholar, drug addict, weight lifting coach, bouncer, and much more. He has authored numerous articles in the popular press and even a scientific text book that examines the neuropsychological basis of human communication. He has also addressed subjects such as philosophy, free speech, weight training, drug use, nutrient effects, street life, and a wide range of other issues.
promoting Marlboro and Miller High Life.
In the end, if one ignored the subtle propaganda, it wasn’t a bad movie after all. Although the filmmaker portrayed the violent scenes as realistically as possible, I’m sure some people will still believe the scenes were over-dramatized.
- Diagnosed with a milk allergy. This will possibly go away when he's 2-3. I am really hoping for that!
Betty has hand drawn many of the elements and calls it 'Autumn Sunset'. Thank you so much Betty for joining us for the challenge. Please take a moment to visit Betty's wonderful blog and please let her know you stopped by.
The Blue Men are breast-high with foam-grey faces;
Allow the design to dry completely, and the clear polish to dry further. The first time I did this, I allowed them to dry over night- this make the decals slide right off without the risk of gooey tears, but I have also done it in as a little as an hour without issue.
After getting all of the milk off of my face ( it took some time washing ) I noticed my pores were minuscule! My skin was glowing and sooooooo smooth! I didn't feel dried out but I did apply moisturizer right away. Waking up this morning my skin feels amazing. Any bumps I had or dry skin is gone!!
And in the words of my Canadian togoma Bruce Cockburn, the trouble with “normal” is, it always gets worse.
Click your heels and pogo, punk out or just sit there.
Doesn’t block the sound as well as the Jawbone, it more or less reduces the background noise. The headset is comfortable and I’ve been able to wear it on long three or four hour conference calls. The ear gels allow you to use the headset without the ear hook which is great for short calls 5 – 10 min in length which is nice for those who don’t want to look like a borg because you can keep the headset in your pocket and stick it in when the phone rings. I’ve found that on longer calls you’ll want the earhook in.
Joomla website design is similar to designing any other web page design. If you want the services of companies that provides Joomla customization India, you would definitely wish to keep the html code simple in order to present a search engine friendly website. This means most of the code will be in CSS file. The companies that provide Joomla customization India services do not design a website that needs using a lot of images in layout.
Time is not on our side my friends; your country needs you RIGHT NOW!
The idea behind this website it`s to promote well known artists / Djs / producers worldwide, and not only, adding news about Trance wave around the globe, more than that, the website will be a new portal, opening new doors for all listeners, people that love Trance (all types) music and not only, people that love electronic music. For all these people around the world, there is TranceSound.net
Beating oars 280
I hope that answers your questions at least somewhat! I hope our esteemed readers will also chime in with their answers to your questions!
WHEN: The book is published today, 11-11-11.
JP Morgan (who are not angels) just closed the Vatican Holy See’s account due to a lack of transparency at a time when Vatican City is striving to be allowed onto the roster of countries with sufficient anti-fraud-anti-money-laundering regulation in place. Maybe their tax-free giant Bank should go the way of the world?
Jay and Silent Bob (Jason Mewesand Kevin Smith), a pair of stoners who’vespent all day hanging out (and dealing weed) outside the Quick Stop, then enter the store. Dante turns down Jay’s offer to party with them. Knowing Dante’s predicament, Silent Bob pauses before following Jay outside and offers the following wisdom: “You know, there’s a million fine-looking women in the world, dude. But they don’t all bring you lasagna at work. Most of ‘em just cheat on you.”
So, that’s my post for today. Writing is out of the way! Wifesy and I are going to rent something that’s up for an award – The Help or Iron Lady – something like that. I’m going to kick back and lose myself in some stories. (After I have those waffles, of course.) Lose myself in some stories like I’ve been doing since I was a kid. Like I’ve been doing since I was 5. It’s going to be a great day.
Just two or three years ago we were up in the north 40 near the horse field mending the fence. We were working around a dead tree that confoundingly continued to leaf out. Time and birds have made a skeleton of this very large tree. Why and how could there still be leaves on it? “Isn’t nature persistent?” we chortled. (OK Maybe I chortled. Julia would have issued a more open chuckle or guffaw.) And then we saw the clusters of berries and the hairy thigh-sized vine insinuated into the depths of the decay. Project detour! We abandon the fencing and set to eradicating this beast. This is why things can take so much longer than predicted. We went up to the house to fully cover ourselves and gather the proper tools. Very carefully we sawed through the vine, painted on poison, dug the root up to reveal the depths of the life-giving tap root, scored the root in a variety of places and applied more poison paint. Viola. Dead.
I wonder if anyone noticed my blanket now has a different border to this post . I wasn't happy with the pink picot edging so I pulled it back and went with my trusty double V edging in cream ( tutorial in my side bar)
Thought I would post a little reminder as we have had a couple of emails saying they missed the deadline for their entries, which is so sad, especially since you have taken the time to complete your creation & of course, us missing out on seeing it.
Bind the sacrifice with cords to the horns of the altar.
our colons so tied in knots that we never thought we'd have a bowel movement again. Our systems had stopped working, jammed with the odor of copy machines, Wite-Out, the smell of bond paper, and the endless stress of pointless jobs done grudgingly to little applause. We had compulsions that made us confuse shopping with creativity, to take downers and assume that merely renting a video on a Saturday night was enough. But now that we live here in the desert, things are much, much better. The overprotestation of that final repetition and stress carry especial conscious irony, I'd say.
So the tour was supposed to start at 10 am. I saw the flyer. My mom called at 9:41 am.
I'm that mom who no matter where we are or where we go will always give her children a sense of home and comfort in her hug.
The Jewish Role in the Bolshevik Revolution is but one subject the International Judaic does not want you to accept as truth, because it will reveal their longstanding and strong affiliation with a RELIGION and a PHILOSOPHY they invented, - a political-religious philosophy that is also directly linked to the most horrendous crimes and atrocities ever committed against the nations where large assemblies of God’s people - the followers of His Son, Jesus Christ, happen to reside.
'Wounded?' was all I could manage.
Well, that was yesterday and Frankie has just rained on the party plans. During breakfast, (Emma claims the sound of bacon hitting the Hemphill grill in the morning is Frankie’s alarm clock) Frankie states that the pool is closing. His dad, a town supervisor, says cracks have to be mended before it will reopen.
To my Jewish friends, I wish you a good Rosh Hashanah; may your new year be prosperous and happy.
I am almost afraid of him. I don't know what to say or do around the erratic part of him, and it is here, bubbling just beneath the surface of what he does, just like the cruel part of me. We both have war inside of us. Sometimes it keeps us alive. Sometimes it threatens to destroy us. (p. 242)
2 brief
Hey, maybe I'll put up those blog posts I wrote in Italy sometime soon. They'd be way late, but still, you know? Okay, so I'm actually going now. Good luck in all your New Year's endeavours. Bye!~
Senor Sisig rolls into Truck Stop, 450 Mission, SF from 11a to 2p.
By the end of the chapter that I’ll be teaching when I get back from Christmas break, my students will have “learned” everything about the preterite–regular, irregular, stem-changing -ir, and verbs with spelling changes (car/gar/zar, i–y verbs). I want them to see and practice the verbs in some type of context, but my ideas are not that communicative. I’m thinking about writing a brief biography of Picasso and a brief history of Guernica in Spanish and making it into a cloze exercise where the students have to fill in the verbs and then answer reading comprehension questions about the information. I’m also thinking about having the students re-write Picasso’s biography in the form of an autobiography. A summative assessment might be writing a simple biography of a famous person, someone they know, or their own autobiography. I’m still pondering the possibilities.
I said I know my favorite nut.
2 childhood
Selangor, another Pakatan-ruled state, is second with RM10.6 billion investment in 2010.
Why do they ? I resonate.
- Pippa Middleton
My total for materials (less rods) was 256.00. (The items I returned to Overstock totalled over 400.00).
How can I love Thee as I ought?
Pouring out could mean a ton of different things. It could mean giving up some of your time to help a friend or simply listen to someone. It could mean donating money to a friend who needs it, it could mean helping a friend pay for gas, it could mean letting them borrow your coat. Pouring out doesn’t have to be complicated. It doesn’t have to be sermon. It could be a friend writing something short and encouraging on your Starbucks cup.
of our once noble ship
Please remember to check our Challenge Rules as occasionally we have to rule out some entries that don't follow them - shame as we like to see you all join in with a chance to win Jenni's digis.
So, about me..
and Roll rage begin here.
Bake for 30-40 minutes, until a test skewer comes out clean.
Lastly, here’s one of the best comments I’ve seen in response to those who say, “It’s just a joke, and it’s fun.”
A Summer Night Fling is into the editors and I can breathe a little easier now that it is out of my hands. I am with nine fabulous M/M authors and I am a little intimidated.
The synopsis sounds bland – and to be honest, there isn’t a whole lot going on in this book. But the illustrations are cunning (in the way that kittens and babies might be). The mole sisters ponder their existence almost absent-mindedly. For them, it’s really an excuse to blow bubbles at fish, float in the weeds, giggle at each other, and bury themselves in the sand.
Loyali
So here you go!
Wildcrafted Nopal Cactus
Before getting on the road to technical development, there are real advantages to individuals and their organizations if both appreciated the impact effective thinking has on learning. Imagine an individual who is negative, pessimistic, lacks self-esteem, and procrastinates. Compare that person to a positive, self-starting optimist who is full of confidence and believes in himself or herself.
Love and kisses,
So… given this reality of diminished institutional interest in providing public access to art—a situation that contributes to a lack of public understanding of all the diverse ways art can be valued emotionally, intellectually, socially and spiritually—perhaps it is little surprise, ultimately, that questions like the one heading this missive are of increasing interest. After all, when people are given no other ways to value art, money is an easy (and sometimes the sole) metric left standing.
Ugly, ugly beer. Just super murky. Sort of a terrible nose, too, reminiscent of dishwater which is never good. I think it was a mix of the hops from the base beer as I've smelled it before on some of their beers. Regardless of why it smelled like it did, it didn't make me terribly interested in drinking it. Started watery with some slight funk but nothing much else. It didn't grow on itself like the others nor did it make me want to keep drinking more. Not everything can be a winner though so we'll just scratch this as experimentation gone wrong. Of course, some people would probably disagree with me and thought it was good so realize this is just my opinion of it.
There was another, younger instructor walking around the side of the room--he said he had more than 80 amateur fights--and I listened as he gave pointers to one of the boxers working on his uppercuts. His instruction was strikingly insightful. He told me when we chatted later that he really focuses on form, and you could see that from what he was telling the student. I learned a lot.
As Baby O has been crawling around vigorously, we noticed red patches on his knees every now and then. I joked we should get him a knee pad. And wow! (Pardon me for my ignorance) There really are knee pads made specially for babies! There’s a number of brands in the market, also easily available at places like Kiddy Palace, Mothercare… etc. However, for style, “Crawlings” definitely tops the cake for me! As recommended on Babble.com, Crawlings Baby Knee Pads!
I made this card with the new sketch over at the WOJ challenge blog.
Right now, I'm working on:
I may actually have some spare time tomorrow, (Yipee!) But I'm not sure yet. (Ah, the suspense!)
or even sorta like them
YUM!!!
It all boils down to this: I feel dreadfully for the fellow (or dame) who is losing the argument. And I get all anxious about how they might be feeling.
“It only takes a second to change the world”, and Rel Whitley can attest to that first hand. Nearly ten years ago, life as he knew it came to a sudden screeching halt, when the patchwork remains of the dead came stumbling into his small hometown, and in less than a week, it was gone. Kingdoms have fallen, cities have burned, the oceans have become nothing more than an endless desert, and civilization as we once knew it has all but disappeared, and now all that remains are scorching heat, and the soulless patchwork husks of what were once humans roaming the wastes.
Didn’t I tell you just the other day not to be too sexy or revealing in the airport?! Kristen, why are you not listening to me?! I’m telling you very plainly and seriously that when you are traveling by plane you must be plain. You must not draw attention to your sexy self. You must NOT under any circumstances reveal your belly button for crying out loud!
Favorite dessert? An old-fashioned hot fudge sundae
20 - This Is The Wishin'
Thank you for your support and your interest in this topic.
You've probably all heard it by now - the statement that made all moms cringe. The statement that simultaneously offended moms who stay at home with the kids as well as those mom who work outside the home. But just in case you missed this gem, here is a quick summary of recent events (Source: http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/politics/2012/04/working-moms-first-ladies-and-recalling-hillary-clintons-cookies/)
Now, are there any habits you think you are better off without, or are there some habits that need to be added or refined?A couple of years ago when we were doing a review of our nutrition, I worked out that by cutting back on sugar in my coffee, I would reduce my sugar intake by 5 kilos per year at least, based on 2 spoons per cup, once a day. I cut back over about a month. What about saving and investment habits, or exercise? How about relationship and social habits, or those that relate to your life passion? If something really is important to you, then you need to make time for it, even if only a little. Right? Each day you have 24 hrs to use so this is about becoming more mindful of the choices you are making each day in every area of your life. Let’s face it, when the end comes, you won’t be wishing you had spent more time watching TV will you? On the other hand you might wish you had read War and Peace, or that you had devoted more time to playing with your kids, mastering pastel drawing, or building an investment portfolio for your family’s long-term financial security.
I love that food has the ability to take me back to another place in time. One bite of something familiar and memories flow back as if it were yesterday. Our taste buds can be path to the the past.
Bar Vinyl is a cosy little venue in Camden placed conveniently only a minute away from Camden Town tube station. They have quite a few themed nights going on at the moment, all of which are free, but me and Charlotte came down to pay special attention to just one of these. Sunday is their Acoustic Showcase night. From the name, you could expect a certain limitation to the type of musicians playing but really the truth couldn’t be further. Although practically stepping out of what can really be called ‘acoustic’ the night was filled up with such a quirky assortment of music that paying no attention to technicalities like this, as always, benefited us all.
Overall, a very good buy for anyone looking for a broad career in writing for children, or for someone seeking publication in any of the fields less covered in other similar guides.
In His Steps repeats this same question over and over and over (pp. 21, 26, 28, 35, 38, 61, 63, 69, 73, 75, 84, 100, 104, 107, 110, 124, 134, 173, 174, 177, 183, 184, 188). The book illustrates the use of this simple test in a host of life-situations. And the test is not without Biblical context. Frequently, author Sheldon uses the question in connection with (1) Walking obediently in Jesus’ steps (pp. 11, 124, 155, 189). (2) Following Jesus (pp. 11, 65, 124, 140). (3) The imitation of Christ – which brought into play the Thomas a’Kempis book by that name, owned by the pioneers, used by them in their Quiet Times, and even later handed out to St. Thomas Hospital patients by Sister Ignatia. (4) Seeking the wisdom of God as Jesus did so often and as believers are directed in the first chapter of the Book of James—a favorite in early A.A.
Attend the dinner and silent auction that's a fundraiser for the Coast Guard Memorial of the CG 1705 crew. Proceeds will go to construct a memorial in their honor. Enjoy a tri-tip and chicken dinner, wine, live music, raffle prizes and a live and silent auction. Casual attire is suggested.
They also have printouts on various subjects and specific information printouts for the provinces on genealogical research tips.
2/9/09
Together we will explore all you ever wanted to know about cycling inIndia. What we know, we will share with you. And what you want to know, we’ll find out for you. Our job is to rekindle your interest in cycling and make it as much fun as it can possibly get.
Thanks for reading all about me - hope I haven't bored you too much! If you like the little samples of my cards below, please stop by my blog sometime.
Once you made the dough into rectangle then place the butter sheet around middle of the dough and seal from all edge, so that there will no butter are exposed. Then gradually spread the dough with butter into a rectangle and make 3 fold. First fold from left and then right. Again spread this folded dough into second turn or second fold and chill the dough for about 2 and ½ hours in the refrigerator.
Here I am, living in the mystery, living with the mysterious Jesus who evinces a sort of wisdom that allows pain and suffering and death because there’s something better he wants to do. The essence of faith is believing that Jesus’ wisdom, no matter how little sense it makes, is wise. The essence of faith is believing that things make sense to God even when they do not make sense to me. I’m not close to mastering this which is why I write about things like anger, envy, and pride.
*have TEETH!!! You cut 4 teeth (top 2 and bottom 2) in about 3 weeks and are doing so well with it!
Did you have good experiences with a midwife or midwives?
passports and visas are required. The government will tell us that this is
The painter and the mound flattener didn't like each other.
DO NOT LET THE LOOPS FALL OFF YOUR FINGERS AT ANY POINT!! Yes, I know I'm shouting, but this is the biggest hurdle to control the yarn, just don't let it off your fingers or out of your grip.
This process is especially interesting in the cigarette plain packaging case British American Tobacco Australasia Limited and Ors v. The Commonwealth of Australia. The consensus of legal academic commentators seems to be that the tobacco companies don’t have much chance of success. Although that was also my own initial reaction, having now perused the parties’ submissions I don’t necessarily agree. BATA’s arguments are at least respectable and have some chance of success.
Over time, I realized I'm not "destroying" anything with my technique, because I always work on duplicates of the original photo layer. Using the word "destructive" is... well... destructive.
Prior to this month's choice, by Julie of Little Bit of Everything, I had never baked Madeleines. I have seen them, and the pans for them, but never had any desire to try them. They looked to me to be fussy cookies, and I assumed they would be a lot of work and they just didn't interest me. Having said all that, when I saw that it was Julie that had picked this recipe I decided I had to give it a go. The fact that they were chocolate madeleines certainly didn't hurt. :)
If you happened to be short on helpers, the long handle is another great feature that makes it easy to even use on yourself! I used to be a pet groomer and have used the Wahl brand clippers, so I know that Wahl makes quality products and I have no doubt this massager will last us a long time!
Way back when I started mtn biking - Dave told me that finding the right mtn bike was difficult. You needed to know what your style of riding and what type of "feel" you like in order to find the right bike. I mentally rolled my eyes at this and thought 'huh? a bike is a bike - how can the same thing be so different from model to model??"
I will be NOT drinking coffee (GASP...I know) for these 24 days, but there will be Spark to help with some long=lasting energy (lasting 3-5 hours), energy that doesn't spike blood sugar!
“Agent Coulson kept those cards in his locker, not in his jacket.”
quite honestly, it seems like just yesterday.
“Lisa!” Seymour was continuing to feign interest in my well-being. “Lisa, what’s the matter?” He called for his nurse.
When you go from feeling energized, excited and in control of your work to feeling an overwhelming compulsion to achieve and produce, you’ve tipped from helpful harmonious passion into harmful obsessive passion
Book is $10.00. new editions can be downloaded to update. This has quilt shops listed throughout the USA. Retails $24.95 Listing is HERE.
That was on a Wednesday. On Thursday I got a reimbursement check relating to childcare and thought to myself, "Aha! I'll just cash this and see how long it takes me to spend $265 and by that time I'll have a chance to run by another branch to get a card made and the checks will arrive and I'll be set."
On March 5 the PA House of Representatives held a budget hearing for PASSHE. House Appropriations Chair Bill Adolph also was supportive of the State System and suggested the House would try and reduce the cuts that the Governor had proposed.
Amano Shrimp are the dwarf shrimp that started it all. They were made famous by Takashi Amano when he started using them in his planted tanks for algae control. Amano shrimp are the best algae eating dwarf shrimp available. Amanos also get larger then other dwarf shrimp making them an excellent choice for tanks with fish that may eat smaller shrimp species.
Optional: Optional only if someone insists on no thank-you note.
When the tin hit the tile, the top opened and out spilled his collection. With arms filled with papers, his little eyes expanded instantly and looked at me with piercing helplessness. What else could I do but stop what I was doing and hit the tile? While on the floor picking up the change, I noticed I was not alone. Several others stopped, even got out of line, to bend down and lend a hand with Aidan’s change. Soon it was together again, back in his tin and safely in his pocket. As if nothing had ever happened, he was off running to play with other children and I was back to conversations.
Been reading articles about the Fukushima disaster that's been going on for thirteen months now and will likely worsen and I can't help but shrug my shoulders and think it's only one among many disasters that have been going on for a hell of a long time; about ten thousand years now. No one...well...almost no one, as the great great majority of humans don't give a fuck about one of the very first, if not the very first disaster humans have ever systematically undertaken and still do, and that's agriculture. I'm not talkin about small scale gardening or something like forest gardening, but full scale biotic cleansing; "good old" agriculture as it's still perpetr...uhm, practiced...no that's right 'perpetrated'. I mean how the fuck can someone with a brain really even believe that that can ever be viable...It is after all the annihilation of ideally every life form from a given piece of land done in order to eliminate all competition and favor the growth of the one or few plants that agriculturalists/civilizationists want to "produce". Everyone knows, right?...or at least should know that that is one of the most destructive and stupid and ultimately suicidal practice one can ever undertake.
ISBN13: 9781846059377
Preheat oven to 375°F.
1 manifestation
=continuing to eat 2+ paleo meals per day
None of the smaller Japanese makers were represented and the only Nikka whisky I saw was an odd "Gold and Gold" bottle dressed up as a Samurai helmet. Incidentally, there was a lot of Scotch that is difficult to get outside Japan, including blends such as Old Parr Superior (6000 yen), at prices that were much better than the Tokyo department stores. There was also a very limited selection of shochu.
The bottom two couples danced a pre-reheased cha cha, side by side, to give the judges one last look at them. Apparently there have been some issues with ‘fan favourites’ going home too early… tell that to Sherry Shepherd who missed this last chance ‘dance off’ by one week.
The lipgloss I found to be a bit sheer which is great for those who just want a natural wash of color. However, I thought it was a tad bit too sticky and had a weird tightening effect on my lips (similar to that feeling of many long lasting lipsticks and lipglosses). However, they are said to have 6 hours of wear, and it did stay on for awhile on my lips even after eating breakfast.
Chrystopher: Gable had the physical advantage of looking big because he was big: six feet and usually around 200 pounds. He was fairly imposing in a landscape and in a crowd without having to work on it. However, you also should remember that he’d had a lot of training in how to use his physique in just the right way at the right time without appearing to be doing that. He could be quite subtle physically; he could even be quite menacing. People forget that in many of his early films he was cast as a villain exactly because of that powerful, purring, big-cat menace he had. Even in Gone With the Wind, in the scene where he comes up behind Vivien Leigh when she’s sitting at her dressing table and demonstrates how he could crush her skull with his hands, you can see that his hands actually do fit right over her head and he’s thoroughly believable. On the other hand, he was also very well-mannered, completely charming and a good listener, and he had developed that technique of connecting with you in a crowded room as if you and he were the only two people there. I’ve talked to people who had exactly that experience on meeting him.
Although it's only been a couple of days since I've last posted it seems like a million years because I've been coming and going and oh so busy here tending to our little life. The old man and I were exhausted last night and this morning after an extensive day in Bozeman yesterday visiting, of all places, the many pawn shops that dot the landscape from Belgrade to the farthest corner of Bozeman. Kurt was looking for something in particular, some tool of some sort and thought maybe he could find it in a pawn shop. Never having stepped one foot in a pawn shop before I was so surprised by the plethora of odd and interesting items in these stores. At the very first place we stopped in I discovered a beautiful silver plated ladies dresser hand mirror that had my name written all over it. Although no, it wasn't sterling silver, the pretty little thing had enough silver in it to catch my eye while the roses scrolled around the edges of the glass and the perfect lines of straight scrolls that became patterned looping scrolls screamed 1960's. I had to have it and so I treated myself to something I've been wanting to find for a long time. I was hoping to find the brush and comb that went along with the mirror but the friendly salesman explained that the mirror had come in as a solo item. Too bad. After the first Belgrade store we stopped in at three or four more before heading to Bozeman from frontage Road.
The saddest thing is that that which we most revile in another is a split-off part of ourself. How would we be – how much wholer would we be, how much more tolerant, loving, compassionate would we be – if we could bring that part home, name it, take away its sting? There are many examples of this repression acted out every day, but a recent one is that of a not-insignificant number of members of the Catholic priesthood so recently called to account in Ireland and in America for raping young boys/girls entrusted to their care. In a religion that places so much emphasis on chastity – and that judges homosexuality – what happens to the sexual impulse if it's repressed for long enough? It has to burst out somewhere eventually. (And, conversely, what does the promiscuous person do with their unrecognised need for sexual containment?)
I'm not kidding about any of these things. It's not exaggeration or an April Fool's joke. This is literally what my day was like. After the conversation with the landscaper, I packed up all my stuff and said to my boss "I have to leave. I literally can not stay in this building one second longer." and I left. And then I took out my aggressions on some weeds in our front yard since I guess the landscaper no longer wanted to do the job.
One is Find Me, by Selyne Maia...but it is more like "Till the day we find you or hold you" or something like that...and of course with other lyrical changes. It is hard to find songs that fit just right.
My oldest and dearest friend, recently had a baby boy. When I saw him he was but three weeks old. He is a beautiful… and it was wonderful to be able to see my dear friends with their son and capture some of those very private tender moments.
Today’s families are busier than ever between work, school and outside interests where schedules conflict. Now’s the time for your family to engage in a quality activity together.
At the Lamb’s High Feast We Sing (LSB 633)
Now I have to assess each article and ask myself some key questions:
Chris Nolan has to be known as the savior of the Batman film. His reboot was able to not only reanimate a long dead Batman (thanks to Joel) but was also able to polish the character into a more realistic and loyal version of himself. Batman Begins is a beautiful adaptation of America’s darkest hero and the rebirth of a legend. Purely an origin story, Batman Begins is very similar to Frank Miller’s classic comic, Batman Year One. Even with that said Begins is it’s own retelling of the Bat as it introduces characters and places that are new and old. Begins is a triumphant new chapter to one of the cinema’s most beloved heroes.
Mark: Anna, we're not going to be late. We're on our way home right now.
1 exit
Tomorrow will be too late.
There have been police calls, hospitalizations, meetings with doctors and principals and counselors and teachers. Ambulance rides and emergency rooms and therapy and pharmaceuticals. Behavior modification techniques, bribery, tearing down and then building back up. More tears shed than can possibly be counted. I've said things to him that haunt me to this day, things said in the white hot heat of a moment, things that can never be unsaid no matter how hard I try.
"Noooooo" Michael groaned in a frustrated whine, and I took Charlie for a while. A few hours later, after Michael had his catch-up nap, he told me about how exhausted he was the night before.
Before we started the adoption process Matt and I embarked on "Plan Simplify". We knew we had too much going on in life and were too busy. We were all work and no play. We were becoming dull. It was negatively effecting everything in life and especially my health. We began cutting out LOTS of things from our lives and living a more simple family centered lifestyle.
19 Science Friction
7:00am–10pm
write it dn
I want to be a masseur, a pilot, a yoga teacher, a writer etc.,
When I embrace the message in the oak leaves.
After a long day with actual errands included we got home, unpacked the groceries and were then visited by my father and two half sisters. Not that I see them as that, it’s actually extremely weird to write that down. They are my baby sisters, the ones I love to mess with, and say I will throw into the lake with the alligators. So with dad and all three sisters in tow we went for a ride that took 2 or so hours of our day. Just to arrive home, and send out to buy dinner and rent a movie.
(This picture can be enlarged by clicking on it. Clicking a second time will make it full-sized.)
On the nose – Punchy citrus. Subtle, but sumptuous malts.
Spaghetti and homemade meatballs with chunky tomato sauce (I doctor up Ragu onion and garlic sauce with sauteed onions, diced tomatoes, olives and Parmesan cheese)
That snow-like mound of coconut (niyog) holds more moisture than you think, but you'll need some help to draw it out. As mentioned earlier, the traditional but messy, inefficient and cramp-inducing method is to simply grab a handful of niyog and squeeze it in your fist with as much force as needed to turn a piece of coal into a diamond, while the precious milk seeps out between your (hopefully clean) fingers.
Lying in bed this morning,....it hit me.
8 oz UK Roasted Barley
Many say their hybrid tulips come back year after year. That’s nice for them, and I think, given proper conditions, it is possible. It’s not possible on my property, and, even if it were, I’m not sure I’d want to give up that much in-ground planting space to tulips
When Mieville finally got to talk, he made a really interesting point about why steampunk has become so popular in the last 12 years. Victorian Britain, the epicenter of steampunk, was built on the proceeds of the Raj, Mieville pointed out. Yet in classic steampunk texts, there is no Raj. Steampunk, he said, expresses a “particular anxiety about resurgent imperialism.” Mieville’s disquisition met with loud applause from the audience. Unfortunately the moderator did not take this as a hint that he should get out of the way and let these guys talk. Oh well. Every Seminar has one. It was just too bad that this year’s happened on the panel I was most looking forward to.
Prof. Elemental – I am a Hip Hop emcee who has embraced both comedy and the world of Steampunk as my musical niche. Although I’m an unsigned artist, I have been lucky enough to find a fan base world wide, largely due to videos on YouTube and utilising new media. I’ve just gone full time with music as my actual profession and I am delighted to say that it is going brilliantly so far.
I have to admit I do try to answer people desirably, you know sound like I care and shit... but I'm realizing doing so and pretending isn't easy for hot mouth me.
My Christmas present came a little early this year. Actually it arrived this past Monday in the form of a voice mail message on my cell. The message began, "This is Robin from Dr. Levine's office and he asked me to call and let you know that your melanoma has been completely removed." I was so elated. What an awesome gift! I had an appointment to see Dr. Levine today (Friday) to have him check the incision and share the results from the wide excision done of a melanoma I had on my back, so getting the news 5 days early was such a relief.
I’m not knocking anyone’s hustle. If you’re a woman that can pull of the man approach, then great. Maybe I can get you to give some tips to the shy guy looking at me in the corner of the room, because if he doesn’t say something soon – he’s going to start to creep me out. And then he really won’t get any cutty.*
Angus - Well, it wasn't too bad because of the old man who kept burping all during church. Every time he said 'Amen' he burped really loud and long.
Seann William Scott ... CRASH
Like many BPD’ers, I’ve made a number of suicide attempts. I’ve barely mentioned them so far because the feelings behind the attempts are still quite raw, even years later. Also like many people with BPD, because I survived it’s assumed they were a cry for help or attention, and so the doctors who treated me in A&E for paracetamol and antidepressant overdoses didn’t take me seriously.
Clarins Colour Quench Lip Balm ($24.99)
Sleep comes more softly
Imagine if that story were true. Would you really believe that race was not a factor in those hateful crimes? Do you think that, despite conclusive DNA evidence from a girl raped by two men, the police would have hesitated to press charges because the suspects were white and it could make things a bit sensitive in the white community? Would the Crown Prosecution Service have refused to prosecute, allowing the child-sex ring to flourish for three more anguished years?
How portable does your new laptop need to be?
rude in Virginia’s woods,
The Coptic Pope rejoices in one of the most grandiose titles in the Christian world. So complex is it, indeed, that it's not entirely clear just what it is. But it goes something like this:
i'm not sure how much blogging will be done this week. #2 son aka not fredo and his lovely dancing lady are arriving today from tampa on their way across country to lalaland. and then on saturday, the MITM leaves. *sigh* i might post some pictures from jazz fest and also some pics from charleston, sc, or not, i'll try.
Rachel had this ridiculous fantasy where she ended up writing this brilliant message. David notices it for some miraculous reason, and then writes her back. Maybe he somehow finds out her e-mail address and writes to her privately. They meet, fall in love, get married, live happily ever after.
THANK YOU ALL that responded to my silly little pleas for votes. You came through for the old doodler and I am feeling the love!!
The conservative backlash against the Obama administration’s decision to invite Lonnie Rashid Lynn Jr., the rapper known as Common, to the White House on Wednesday night for a poetry slam is both overblown and off the mark.
7.6% abv. Made with somewhat rare Sorachi Ace hops and Brooklyn's Belgian yeast strain...then 100% champagne yeast re-fermentation. The corked and caged bottle opens with a big pop and pours yellow gold with a thick marshmallow head that is not going anywhere anytime soon. I poured it into a Chimay glass and the carbonation is clearly visible in the center of the glass 10 minutes after the first pour.
It's not the usual things. We don't all work at the same company or in the same profession. We don't all come from the same ethnic, socio-political, religious, or any other sort of background. We're not all the same age, and our kids aren't all the same age. We didn't go to school together, or pledge (or refuse to pledge) the same sororities and fraternities.
Pembrokeshire is as yet pretty much as it should be, a quiet Welsh Market town untouched by multiculturalism. A great big thank you to all who attended. There is much opportunity to be made in this part of Britain, and we shall not miss it.
Song not only chosen because it matches this post, also because my MM-fanatism has been reanimated by a little birthday gift (thanks for that at this point!).
Melissa Gilbert apparently was rushed tot he hospital after this dance with an injury. I didnt see anything that wouldve provoked an injury in her dancing, in my opinion, it was flat and she had some unsure moments (which Maks took the blme for…)
I have been able to feed my love of merchandising with vintage props through the business that I am one half of ‘The Cupcake Wrapper Co.’
Since its opening in 1913, the hotel has undergone many changes and has had a couple of new owners. In the lobby, you can find the elaborate private collections from these owners in the several sitting areas. After adding several hundred more guest rooms and updating their looks, the San Marcos Resort has become what Dr. Chandler always dreamed it would be, an oasis in the desert.
“Being justified freely by his grace through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus.”
By SAM HANANEL
of, oh, horses, something that was running forward, and that led me
In a fixed-term contract, a reversion clause may not be needed, unless the fixed term is unusually long (for me, "unusually" would start at about eight years)--though publishers often do cover themselves by allowing for discontinuation of publication for various reasons, such as slumping sales. In a life-of-copyright contract, however, the reversion clause is vital. Unless you're Harper Lee or some other perpetually-in-print luminary (and maybe not even then), there's no reason in the universe for a publisher to hold your rights for so long.
Review: The Sherlock Holmes Mysteries are a great collection of short stories. They are set in England back in the 1800′s. Each chapter is a new intriguing and exciting mystery. I took my time reading these stories, and read other books in between, but the are defiantly worth reading. Even if you just pick the book up, and read one of the stories every once in a while, they are worth it. I suggest this book to any teenagers or adults who enjoy mysteries. It may be hard to follow for anyone younger then that. Here is a pic of the cover…
Alternatively titled, “OK, let’s make this harder.” I’ve got your attention now, don’t I? Relax, it’s not all that! Today’s WOD was a lot of fun and there were lots of laughs shared around the gym this morning.
cheery lynn flourish
We have to say, we don’t really mind this Izumo guy. He’s got a lot on his plate: the imminent collapse of his world and nothing to save it with. He’s done depending on others; needs a True Eve pronto. He’s a pragmatic guy; so rather than pounding his chest and attacking, he begins with peaceful negotiations. One girl in exchange for no war; which is not a bad deal. Only, there’s no telling what he and Altair will be up to in if their power is restored. For all we know, maybe Altair needs to be weak if Vega is to thrive. Izumo refers to Vega as a former battlefield; it would seem from the look of the two worlds that his side lost. It also means he’s a seasoned veteran and a pro; not some greenhorn teenager, and pilots his mecha accordingly. The Aquarion Gang is good, but aren’t any match for Izumo.
I can’t wait to see what the next 3 years have in store for me!
But I AM excited, and admittedly very giddy about the two authors I'm featuring in today's BIG NEWS FEATURE FRIDAY!!
“ME!” reply the patients simultaneously…
27 Laurence Vanay - Le Coeur Lourd
Silk flowers from the dollar store
All of this walk down memory lane came about because I stumbled across a short video that has a short outtake from one of his sermons. It is a powerful 3 minutes.
Today I told him. I opened up the conversation with "if the school could give you a bit more help, what subjects would you think you'd like to concentrate on?" He named 3. I said maybe we could look at whether we could get that to happen, having another meeting with the school to see what they could offer him. Then I sort of wove into "well, you know that woman we went to see the other week? The one who sees quite a lot of people your age? Well, she thinks..... and that would mean you could get a lot more support". He told me to go away.
What you should avoid: Absolutely nothing, as a matter of fact, we highly encourage you to try everything!
Loving-kindness is one of the main character traits of God. God sustains the world through acts of loving-kindness, undeservedly so. We are weak, and we stumble and fall, constantly. We sin against others, against ourselves, and against God. And what do we deserve for that? Death. But God remembers us and sustains us. That is loving-kindness.
I know there will be an eleventh book, get back on the horse, Harris, and quick.
so now she’s tidying aggressively
14. Miraggio Di Alfredo (00:54)
*This is a product review. Wild Science sent me one kit for the purpose of Review - all thoughts are my own :) *
Due to the first past the post and the unfair way that the demographic maps are used to ring fence support, the Tories actually returned 18 seats and the Labour only 8.
Pearls : Dazzle Me Gems Western Romance by Webster's Pages
I tried pushing these heavy thoughts out of my mind but they refused to budge. It was a fitful night.
(St Michael's Kirche)
But travel over the pond, and we have people like Ben and Gareth Thomas ( an amazing Welshman who came out) who are standing up to that kind of nonsense and making the world a better place for LGBT and questioning youth all over Europe, the Americas, and beyond. We hope that Ben and Gareth are still playing when Eli gets older and can begin to get behind a sports figure. I know Tod will do his best to indoctrinate Eli to the culture of the Big House at the University of Michigan, and I know my family will do their best to pull him south to the Buckeyes. Add in his grandpa and foster dad and their love of Michigan State and the boy will have much to cheer for regardless of the school. But I want them to know about Ben and Gareth as well. I want them to know that superstars don’t have to be on the pitch to make a difference in the world.
I can't wait to try this soap!
I'm pleased to say that it lived up to my vague but positive memory of renting it back in '90. Although clearly a very low-budget film, it has a smart and genuinely witty screenplay that keeps you guessing almost until the end, strong B-movie performances from Forster, Robert Davi (Licence To Kill) and leading actress Hilary Shepard (a lovely woman who really should have had a bigger screen career), and amazing stunt work of the kind you rarely see today, even in big-budget studio flicks.
So why does my life feel so empty and bare?
1/2 Medium Sized White Onion
This is a group of books I have had for several years but not gotten to read. Since it doesn't look like I will get to read them for another year (or more!) I am passing them on. Although as I type them part of me still says "But you may want to read that some day!" Yes, yes; along with the other 700 books I am housing! Must Let goooooo.....
I guess that's my story for now. I seriously think if I hear another person tell me "it can't happen here," I may sock him in the nose.
SMS: What were some of your favourite things related to sewing this past year?
I also say if you need to sub ingredients, don’t worry. The sour cream in our fridge had gone bad and the only thing in there was vanilla flavored greek yogurt. So I used that instead and it came out just fine. There are subs for buttermilk, eggs, cake flour, you name it. In fact, I ran out of cake flour halfway through the amount I needed, so I used regular all-purpose flour for the rest. No biggie. It tasted good regardless. Just look it up online. They always have answers online.
The young American man who rang up my book purchases asked me if I wanted the special stamp in my books . . . I guess it's the Shakespeare and Company passport.
If it so happens that we’ll relive another Irish ‘summer’, I’ve invested in some back-up threads. Next to my diaphanous floaty tunics are some slick-as-Rick tribal and animal print ponchos (£55) from Rainwave.co.uk. One hundred per cent waterproof and kitted out with their own travel bag, these bad boys stick two manicured fingers up to the sky. Sure, I’ll be grumbling, my tan may have faded but dammit I’ll look fabulous!
So that is the process I follow when preparing our vacation (or other theme) albums. I'm about 20 pages into my album and it's coming out just as I hoped it would! I LOVE IT! Here are some pictures of the first few pages.
The Police have the power to arrest someone on suspicion of drug driving even if the drugs they have taken are legal. The law defines a ‘drug’ as being ‘any intoxicant other than alcohol’. Basically, if a person has taken a substance which is neither a drink nor food and it is alleged to have affected the control of their body, this could be classed as a drug.
Before the building I work in was The Fancy Pants Hotel it was a fancy pants department store called Lipman and Wolfe. It's been standing here for a hundred years, so we decided to throw the old beauty a birthday party tonight, in the theme of 1912.
I had a steak, creamed spinach, fries, 2 beers, coffee and a cheesecake.
Slavery, as we all (allegedly) know is immoral. (Premise 2)
Best Make-Up
“Gray, the note?”
He told us all about his books and where some of the ideas came from and afterwards we queued for nearly an hour to get his signature. Here is Steve trying to shoot my youngest son, Joe, with the space ray gun Silly Scott made:
Friday, 4 January. The cold out of doors at ten this forenoon was more intense, to my apprehension, than I ever remember. My beard froze, the nape of the neck, & the heart, seemed paralyzed, headache came on, & at the end of the short walk from here to Whitehall I was almost helpless. At 4, I walked westward, thinking to call on the Thackerays. The Horseguards Parade & the Mall were one sheet of snow, with paths trodden but not swept: a thick brown fog brooded over it, deepening the twilight; muffled spectral figures hurried to & fro across the slippery ground. . . . In Victoria Street a girl begged of me: a ragged tall lusty girl of 19, by name Caroline Randall, by trade an ironer; who has no home; who slept last night on a step in a sheltered corner, & felt 'as cold as a frog', she said.
I obviously learned how to read, write and do basic math. I also remember being called 'Fatso' and believing that I was fat though wasn't. Some time in grade 2 I did put on weight during the holidays and I was conscious of that. I was very quiet and always felt like an outsider. I was a lunch monitor once and after being trampled by the big kids at the canteen I cried and ran away, which resulted in me falling over and I have school photos with my knees with bandaids.
ONE of the aspects of this project that I didn’t consider when I started was the amount of technology I would also be teaching when I use the iPads with my students. Not only am I introducing a learning activity, but I am also embedding some basic, and also some elaborate technology skills. I didn’t really think about this until people started to visit my classroom recently.
6) When did William Hurt enroll at the Shatner school of enunciation?
What I think I was trying to say when I started is this: Don’t be intimidated by the idea that you must outline. Don’t think you can’t start the novel you’ve been dreaming about because you have no clue how it’s going to end. Go with what is comfortable for you and find your way. By all means, try outlining because it is a wonderful tool, but don’t lock yourself into the thinking that you have to follow it once it’s there. Nothing is cast in stone, everything is malleable Thenwhen the creative juices flow and the words pound at the inside of your skull demanding to be set free, you can give them the outlet they need, hammering away at your keyboard or pouring from your pen. Whatever you do, just keep writing and let the outlines take care of themselves.
Writing a novel is more difficult than being a New York City banker. I know this first hand. For seven years, I worked in the corporate finance area of one of the largest banks in New York. As a young woman from Alabama, I ended up in the fast paced lane near Wall Street. I loved it there, and I loved the man I met there. We got married and our first daughter was born at Mount Sinai Hospital during one of the hottest summers New York City ever had.
1/2 c. parmesean cheese
TAN: picture booth?
You’re obsessively,
4) Give up the old habits and don’t be afraid of a little discomfort sometimes. With your good integrity and persistence, you will achieve success at a meaningful level.
From my reading of the letters and now these m’s, I’d argue that much of what is found in the Juvenilia is read into them; I’m not saying the diabolic and anger is not there, but that it was not consciously intended or admitted to. Like her family, Jane Austen deflected the satire, anger, resentment of her texts; the family called such passages “nonsense” or neutrally “vigorous;” Austen described it as “fun,” delightful, and laughed.
In Tuesday’s State House Finance Committee meeting, Rep. Anna Fairclough (R-Eagle River) caused a stir when she asked University of Alaska President Mark Hamilton for help understanding why she should advocate funding the University when many students and staff oppose the development that provides the lion’s share of state revenue.
On Wednesday, May 23 at 3:00 PM EDT, NALP is presenting “Summer Success: Getting the Most from Your Summer Public Interest Experience.”
Born December 24, 1974 in County Cork, Ireland, Noel Fehily enjoyed the biggest success of his career so far when winning this season’s Stan James Champion Hurdle on the Paul Nicholls-trained Rock On Ruby. After gaining experience on the point-to-point circuit and in hunter chases in his home country, he began riding in Britain as an amateur and gained his first success on Ivy Boy at Plumpton on November 16, 1998. He rode 12 winners in that first campaign and turned professional after two successes in 1999/2000, which he ended with a score of 17. Dogged with injury throughout his career, Fehily has also enjoyed Grade One success on Air Force One at Punchestown in the 2008 Champion Novice Chase, on Master Minded in the 2010 Tingle Creek Chase and aboard For Non Stop in this season’s Scilly Isles Novices’ Chase at Sandown Park. Fehily rides primarily for Emma Lavelle, Charlie Mann and Warren Greatrex. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2001 Moral Support (Ref 8th); 2002 Celibate (6th); 2003 Good Shuil (PU bef 19th); 2004 Alcapone (PU bef 25th); 2005 Merchants Friend (Fell10th);
My parents' failures in my upbringing
“Hey buddy,” he said to me.
Occasional diarrhea.
"WHAT!! Emily, I absolutely did not shoot any bunnies !"
The exercise was to work in primary colors: red, yellow and blue. Easy, right? Not when the yellow ceramic is soft, pale shade — and my pencils are all strong colors. I managed to get the teapot and the mug done in two hours, when the teacher finally came by to take a look.
4. Post at least 3 times a week
Well, that’s actually my first time to walked out of a restaurant without a complete meal. In my opinion they have to improve the services, and create some sort of SOP since I found that they are a mess in form of coordination.
A couple of weeks back I wrote an angry letter to someone in my life and posted it without much further explanation, however as I sit here tonight, waiting for someone, anyone, to contact me and preoccupy me, I realise that I haven’t stood still since that phone call.
To serve, you top the beets with balsamic gastrique, which is just balsamic vinegar and sugar cooked together (for a really long time) until it becomes syrupy.
ULDKM Blog (uldkmblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Of course, there’s something to be said for the smaller size for reading ebooks, or taking on the commute, and we doubt you’ll be able to use the Acer Iconia Tab A200 for either of these. It’s too heavy to hold comfortably for long periods, and the bulky chassis isn’t as easy to slip into a case or a bag as the Toshiba AT200 or the BlackBerry PlayBook.
The number one factor that will dictate how bullying impacts your child is his or her self-esteem. A child with high self-esteem will not pay as much attention to the antics of bullies as those children with poor images of themselves. To keep your child’s self-esteem high, make sure that they have a good social group to lean on. Enrol them in sports and extra-curricular activities that they enjoy. Take an interest in their work and make sure that they feel safe and secure at home. Help them set goals and reward them when they are reached.
But the big treat of the basket is this~ a hand-hemmed Vintner's Cloth from the Paris Flea; cotton & linen, incredibly soft; Brooke can use this as a small lap blanket outside at one of her homes, perhaps in the kitchen or as a tablecloth~
Oh, go on then, we’ll double-post just because I did take a few photos of people! People are very interesting – and there were a heck of a lot at the Museum today..! Luckily, it’s a pretty big place and other than the first room (through which everyone walks) there was plenty of space to wander and read and take in the history.
you guys are such awesome enablers! thanks to all of you who shared your two cents on yesterday's conundrum. sounds like several of you have a similar setup. which means i'm not crazy, and that i will probably be moving forward with operation sitting room. yippee! more furniture to buy!
The Program:
Even as I was doing all of this, 49% of me was saying, "you stupid shit. You are going to hate yourself for this." But the other 51% was wheedling in my ear, telling me that I deserved a little break, what with all the stress I had been under, and wouldn't it be nice, and relaxing, to smoke.
Here's the long story (sorry!) and the unnecessarily complete recordings of my first band!
Last night’s sponsors include: Subway, Chili’s, Red Lobster, L’Oreal, Ford, Hotwire, and AT&T.
Greenbelt Middle School is expected to transition into its new educational facility in fall 2012. The building utilizes a variety of ecosystem services including, but not limited to, geothermal heating and cooling, and an extensive green roof to earn LEED Gold status.
n’avesse disfatta.”
While this year's crop of babes in arms are told:
Psyched!! Let's take it a step farther though, How about a Gift Certificate to the CASH STORE!!!
RETRACTABLE SCREEN DOOR
my brother
I'm a host of imperfection
If you don't have a plastic bottle handy, you can use a glass jar and poke holes in the lid large enough for your pest of choice to get in.
I would like to tell you all a story... it's actually more like a dream, in Spanish it would be called a "sueño" and it goes like this:
Until yesterday, the original Jurassic Park was the only one of the trilogy I'd not seen on the big screen. What an immense slap to the face for any film fan; to have seen the rubbish Jurassic Park 3 as intended, but not its actually good original bit. I've seen Jurassic Park at least seven times on television, VHS and DVD, but watching it at the cinema seemed like seeing it again for the very first time. Having seen Jurassic Park at the cinema, I can die a happy and complete man (unless, y'know, someone wants to do the same with Tim Burton's Batmen and maybe a few Star Wars).
was infected with the kissing disease,
Another factor against us is the current global economic climate and the threat of a third World War. No one would have the money or the inclination to come help us, because they'd be struggling to survive themselves and other countries have an obligation to take care of their own people first. Africa will be forgotten and because they have no sense of responsibility they will starve and die from disease while fighting each other.
With all of this in mind, hopefully I will meet other people with similar goals, either here, or if I’m lucky enough, Strasbourg, to start creating a future with equality and a wealth of skills that doesn’t need the world as it is to survive. We can and we will prevail with a united voice, and now is the time to start making all this possible.
Johansson ME, Holmstrom S, Abebe A, Jacobsson B, Ekman G, Samuelson A, et al. Intrauterine fetal death due to echovirus 11. Scand J Infect Dis 1992; 24: 381-385.
PCHR submitted a criminal complaint to the Israeli authorities on behalf of Mahmoud Mattar on 30 December 2009. To-date, no response has been received.
10 Steps to a Stronger Immune System
Once in awhile I get this itch I can't reach. It sits there on the edge of my brain begging, pleading to be scratched. Generally the itch is called "boredom", and the scratching is called "cut your hair". I'm not sure why it is that I go through phases of really, really wanting to cut my hair, but it might have something to do with not actually having loved any of my haircuts since two summers ago... when I cut it in a longish pixie cut. The problem comes when I get the hair-cut-itch, but simultaneously really want to grow my hair back to the long tresses I had in my teen years. So instead of cutting it, I did something crazy. I dyed it. Well actually I bleached it... twice... and then I dyed it. The picture is after the first bleaching, I had to go to work the next day with rather yellow hair. After work I bleached it again, and then dyed it an ash blonde. It is at a pretty nice blonde now, and not too overwhelmingly yellow (yay!).
List of Items needed:
The onsite Cadbury World Experience is mostly aimed at children, a brief history here and an amusement arcade ride there but if you're wishing for an indepth tour of the factory, forget it. You're allowed to see a (very) brief part of the packaging process - which is a mechanical marvel of engineering - but the rest of the place is shrowded in mystery and taking pictures inside this glorious establishment is forbidden.
Anyways, the food! I loved the food in Saigon! We were able to get a per diem for our food and just eat from street vendors and such. Some highlights were Banh Mi (which is a sandwich of eggs or meat and vegetables on a baguette), smoothies, and this delicious and super cheap pork and rice. Also that month we went to the Hard Rock Cafe. We needed a little American food!
Mark Wahlberg, same as always. :) I mean, c'mon!
Monday -
BUT I managed to track down the stallion station that she technically belongs to, FINALLY. After calling repeatedly to every place around here that I could think of, I finally managed to talk for 5 seconds to the owner of the colt and found out which place she was from (I never see him so it was quite a feat!). Once I found that out, I called the main farm, and was told that I had to call ANOTHER number. I called that number... no answer! I called a second number, and finally was able to get through to SOMEONE that had an idea of what was going on. After some sleuthing, we found exactly what we already knew: her approximate age (somewhere between 7-10), and her color, and her brand. And that was it. I talked to the main vet as well, and he said that all the recipient mares come in on a dealer truck, and the dealer didn't keep records of them either. So basically, we still know absolutely nothing about her, except that at some point she was probably in a feedlot. I'm glad she is no longer in the feedlot, but still... being a mishandled uterus isn't much of an upgrade really.
2130.***E-VI/20/2003. On the fiftieth-anniversary recollections of the Rosenberg executions. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-51.) See Item E-VI/30/1953, above.
or your citizenship
2 enlarge
For astronomers, 11 years of observation is considered a short time and 20 light years, which is roughly 190 trillion kilometres, rather close. The sun is around eight and a half light minutes from Earth.
And on a couple little side notes. One commenter asked if we wanted to return to the days of the Glass-Steagall Act “…which limited credit growth and therefore slowed down economic growth…” Errr, am I wrong in remembering that the full repeal of Glass-Steagall occurred in 1999, at the height of one of the biggest economic expansions in history? So how exactly did it slow down economic growth? The commenter then went on to point out that no Canadian banks failed due to smart regulations — which, while in opposition, the current Conservative government fought against — and kind of proves my point for me, doesn’t it? We missed the brunt of the financial shitstorm because of government regulation and oversight not because a lack of it. Or am I missing something?
So I went for a quick coffee break at my local cafe (I love it, it has the nicest atmosphere, yummy food and they love kids) on Monday, with William. He'd been a good boy all morning and I thought he was in the right frame of mind for sharing a bit of cake with his Mummy :)
Treasury officials routinely testify before her subcommittee. The committee noted that Water’s husband had resigned his position on the board of One United five months before the meeting between Paulson and the NBA in September 2008. The subsequent letters, memos and correspondence between Waters office and the NBA essentially confirm that a meeting was requested, the NBA officials did attend, and that her office was informed of the meeting.
How can people be persuaded of the potential of online assessment? Talk about the possibilities of capturing in-the-moment, of giving online feedback without necessarily setting an online assessment.
Occupation
Who has ever had a hope without a constant dream?
I-Ice Cream- Favorite? Never been a fan of ice cream either (how did I get fat???) but if I had to choose I'd say rainbow sherbert
(Los Angeles Times) KABC TV
We are lucky in that Maxi is great at sport and hope that he can use this as an outlet to help get through school without sticking out as the clever one or the nerd. It was how MadDad managed his intelligence and maybe Maxi and one day Mini can do the same.
After a while, he caught on to the fact that I was gaming his game and he didn't like it. One day, after I'd given him my stock response, he inquired,"What do you know, Mister Maier? Do you know you're gonna flunk this class?"
Rule #3: Screw Mechanics
The nation's secondary schools aren't good enough. This is not a problem, it will never be solved. Some identifiable problems might be solved, but the system as a whole requires constant attention. The school system will get better, but will never not need your attention.
She had every advantage that normal people never have. She could afford the best doctors, the best chefs, the best therapists and she still chose to be a piece of shit.
Absolutely disgraceful.
I won't, but you should.
The app interacts real-time with 14ers.com data so there’s no need to push content updates through the app store when changes are made on 14ers.com. It conveniently stores information and images for offline use or in the backcountry, when you don’t have an Internet connection.
Do you believe prayers are answered? Is “No” an answer? Who or what answers them, and how? What do you do when you don’t get the answer you want? What do you do if you don’t get an answer at all? These are all rhetorical questions because the answers are too individual specific. They are different for each one of us.
When writing the report be specific about why you did or didn’t like what you read as well as what you did and didn’t like, and don’t be kind. In other words, we want the honest and blunt truth (the author will not see this). Occasionally you may have trouble discerning why exactly you just weren’t excited about the read, but do your best to ferret out the reason. Warning: be careful that your report is objective and not too personal. Being uncomfortable with the level of sexuality in an erotic romance, for example, is not telling me whether or not the book is publishable.
(6) All persons who by themselves or their predecessors in interest have been in the open, continuous exclusive, and notorious possession and occupation of agricultural public lands, as defined by said Act of Congress of July first, nineteen hundred and two, under a bona fide claim of ownership except as against the Government, for a period of ten years next preceding the taking effect of this act, except when prevented by war, or force majeure, shall be conclusively presumed to have performed all the conditions essential to a Government grant and to have received the same, and shall be entitled to a certificate of title to such land under the provisions of this chapter.
Tory MP Peter Bone last night hit out at the “absurd” situation. He said: “How we let this man into the country in the first place is beyond my comprehension.
Alex Leybourne http://alexlaybourne.com/ He is another author – short stories and novels who posts about his writing – really gets to the gut of it. Inspiring.
However, attending the Rose Bowl game in person may have slightly changed my mind. I am a die-hard Oregon Ducks fan; so, this year, I was lucky enough to attend the Rose Bowl where they defeated the Wisconsin Badgers for their first Rose Bowl win in 95 years.
I leave in 13 days. I can't wait. I can't wait to get there.
Sarah and Zachary decided that they didn't want to do it. I was fine with it, but I told them that I still expected them to keep up with their reading. I also told the kids that based on how many books they read this summer (either by the week or the month, I haven't decided which yet) that I would give them little treats or trips to keep them interested. They loved this idea. Secondly, I only expected the younger four to participate in my little reading experiment. Amanda and Anthony are really busy this summer. Amanda with work and Anthony with the high school band. Plus, they don't need to be reminded to read, they just do it.
Local contestants include: Gorilla Barbeque, Grandpa Jones Smokehouse, Firehouse BBQ, Hats Off To Dining and Holy Hog, the defending barbeque champion!
Oct 10 – Hampton Beach Casino Ballroom – Hampton Beach, NH (W/Cobra Starship)
Lisa sent me such thoughtful things. Some fantastic and funky papers, some photo mount strips, a gold pen, two pop-up cards that she made herself and HAND WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS to make my own! How incredibly thoughtful of her. There are also some paper flowers and a small canvas with acrylic paints; apparently I forgot to tell Lisa in my introduction, that I have zilch ability when it comes to painting or drawing Ha ha .
Under the terms of the proposed PROTECT IP legislation a US federal prosecutor who finds a foreign website that is “dedicated to infringing activities” can force all US internet service providers, domain name registries, domain name registrars and operators of domain name servers to block either the offending page or the whole web domain from the DNS
I stare blankly for a moment or so and mentally recall all our previous conversations. Maybe it’s got something to do with that harmony stuff again, this is a mild reprimand for breaking the hierarchical order of things. And it’s so obviously a lie designed to save face by rewriting history that I wonder if perhaps I’ve imagined an alternative reality where all the stuff in my menory actually happened. Such illogical brinkmanship is common as diagional walking here.
Singer, 2005 American Idol winner, vegan
Leon!!!
At the time, there was a little "cool" revival. Sinatra. Dark bars. Attitude.
And Hermes with his flying feet
Need any last minute gift ideas for teachers, babysitters, mail carriers, hair dressers, etc? Dunkin' Donuts has an awesome gift pack of 2 pounds of their original coffee and 2 thermal commuter mugs for $19.99! You can even split it into 2 gifts for $10 each! Not bad! Or Dunkin' Donuts offers rechargeable gift cards in any amount between $5 and $200. (Man, I'd love me one of these because let me tell ya, I run on Dunkin'!)
Any tossers that tell me “they are a bunch of overpaid nancy boys” will get a lesson in economics. Off of me I tell you. A lesson in supply and demand and scarcity of resource. That footballing talent has economic value because people are willing to pay to see it due to its entertainment factor. That economic value is dependent on scarcity of resource and the market determines their remuneration. That no one gets the job because they went to the right school, have got the right certificate, know the right people or know a funny handshake. They are where they are because they can play, and you are not in the team because you can’t. Meritocracy, guv. It ain’t unfair. It is nought but snobbery and jealousy to be unhappy that a thick lad from the rough end of a rough town with no GCSE’s who can kick a ball earns more in a week than you or I do in a year and is rattling a pop star bird. Good luck to the uneducated incoherent lads. In the words of James Brown “I got mine, don’t worry about his”. Want to moan about professional sport, the lack of Corinthian spirit, the lack of amateur idealism? Have a read of this, then moan. Professional sport is how the people took the game off the idle classes. Professional sport is the key to its accessibility, how the working man played and beat his betters, its whole meritocratic nature.
The biscuits on the table on Sunday were Marion Cunningham’s, of course, because that’s how I’m doing things this year. This woman is teaching me so much! Like that cream biscuits are virtually impossible to mess up. Impossible! Even if you, like me, become convinced that you messed up the recipe and want to throw away the dough without even baking it and your husband and house guests have to talk you down by promising to eat said biscuits, no matter how bad they are. Which they aren’t. They’re outstanding.
Oftentimes, we are simply unaware of the roles we have played and assumptions we have made about who we are and what we are capable of. We are not limited by them, however, though we are if we are not aware. In the message of Jesus, we are called and have the freedom to become the person we want to be. John Harvey reminded us, “We are much more than the worst thing we have ever done and we should believe that, and find peace there.” Come to terms with who you are where you came from. Have compassion for yourself first, so that you can share it with others. John Harvey shared, “It is very difficult to love others when you do not have your safety and love/belonging needs met. We live in a lot of fear in our culture and our politics promote ‘fear of the other.’”
“There were these two people on the bus, a guy and a girl. Real trashy dirty looking, about twenty. They’re friends with the guys in the Cadillac. The car is kind of following them while they’re on the bus. I don’t really know why, but they keep getting off the bus, then they meet up with the guys in the car, drive somewhere, get back on the bus again.”
The faithful around the world send the Claretians their stories of hope and their special intentions. They also flock to Solemn Novenas to St. Jude, which take place five times each year at the National Shrine of St. Jude on Chicago’s South Side.
Enjoy this tidbit.
Oh hi. I didn’t see you there. This is Definitely Improvised. That is both a true statement and the title of this site. This podcast masquerades as an improvised radio show. I am the disembodied typing words of one Bryan Fernando, a 25-year-old comedian from Portland, OR. Odds are, you know who Bryan is because only Bryan’s friends know about this podcast. What happens each week (okay, let’s be honest, every few weeks) is I will have some friends over, we will talk about stuff, and then we will pull some newspaper clippings out of a Ziploc bag and do scenes based on those newspaper clippings. Sometimes we follow a living room format, sometimes we follow an Armando type of format. This time we did a sort of Harold format. After all is said and done, we improvise the interstitial music.
The Old Fort proved elusive and when we finally found it we arrived at the split second three enormous tour buses disgorged their touristy contents and that was that for us. We could not even get near the doorway for the queue and chaos, so I took a quick photograph and we hailed a taxi to take us towards the skyscrapers and the sister hotel to ours on the beach. It took longer than we thought down long two-lane highways where once there was bare desert. I could not recognise a thing. The Dubai I remembered from two decades ago has disappeared under a staggeringly relentless and ostentatious display of material weath and power, set in stone, literally, by their extraordinary building programme. You speed through a jungle of hotels, apartment blocks, offices and, inevitably, shopping malls. Dubai has long been known as the place to go for designer fakes, but they have taken consumerism to extraordinary new levels. Twenty years ago I remember a rather scruffy area of dodgy looking shops selling, to my eyes, dodgy looking goods which I had no desire for anyway. Apart from a load of pirate music tapes which I was foolish enough to buy which, when I got them home and popped them into my tape player, I had to wait a good five minutes before any music actually started to play and the quality was, predictably, appalling.
One day in and Sun News has already made enemies.
My other example is my son. I know that seems odd, because to some extent I probably taught him to persevere, to look on the bright side and to be kind. But again, he has a talent that far exceeds any abilities I might have in these areas. Orion is just a happy guy. He finds delight in the smallest things. He knows how to be satisfied. He assumes everyone he meets likes him and is pleased to meet him. It’s amazing to watch him struggle so hard and come up smiling. My favorite part of the day is watching him get excited about something.
Thanks for stopping by. Guess I need to create a birthday card tonight! Do I still know how to stamp? I'll find out!
Then we joined the day's
“Walk, it’s getting dark and cold.”
568 - Harold Baines
I also found these simple directions from Better Homes & Gardens. BHG includes the cute decorative accent stitching. Almost makes me want to sew. Hmm, we'll see.
But we can’t complain: the clothes look interesting on paper (you can see sketches in the video below, and photos of the dress Donatella wore to her men’s show yesterday) and we’re excited to see how they wear when they reach stores later this year. Take a look for yourself and tell us if you’ll be buying any of it.
No estaba contento como funcionaba el formulario de Google Docs. Esta nueva opción va directamente a nuestra base de datos de Sugar & Spice.
"Then there are only three options:" Said J. "You can throw it away, eat it, or hold it. All night."
A previous contender for the title of Britain's Biggest Burger was rather aptly named the Titanic burger.
It didnt HAVE to be emotional – the theme was ‘Most Memorable Year’ – but of course it WAS emotional because obviously, the best sotry wins the night … am I right? You know I am.
Any special privelege opportunity that might arise immediately goes to the leader of the day rather than the kids squabbling about it.
I have a quince tree.
Spread Your love upon the walls
I had Planned on visiting with her next week, over on the Penninsula, but the radiation is going to make her
Guitar Wolf are known not only for their music but their style, decked out in leather from head to toe, rockabilly styled haircuts and always rocking the shades. Their live shows ooze as much cool as their appearance does, ignoring the frantic pace that they play at reportedly the live shows in the past have seen props such as giant over sized amps, huge light displays and microphones that spew fire. How much of that will be in the Cluny is debatable, but what’s not is that Guitar Wolf will be delivering a frantic live show with an unmatched energy that will assault your eardrums.
my support group...it was clear in reading my blog that it was pivotal to my journey in the beginning of the year.
This document is released in public interested in free sat tv for computer and if you have any further queries just post them below along with your experiences and I will be glad to respond.
2. Skin 4 - 5 potatoes and cut into cubes.
“When we meet you?” says another.
Wendy has been a member of the J.M. Wilson Team since 2005 and serves as the Human Resource Manager. She oversees all human resource functions including, but not limited to, recruiting and retention, benefits administration, policies and procedures, employee relations, and payroll. Wendy loves that every day is different. She loves to travel and is fortunate that she is able to do so, and get paid for it! In her free time (if she has any!), Wendy serves on three Volunteer Boards; enjoys reading with her daughter, Abby; volunteers with the Parent Teacher Organization at her daughter’s school; plays golf; and travels with her husband, Dan.
Jean-Yves Hocquet met me at the entrance to the house one lunchtime and very kindly gave me a tour around the property. The portes cochères lead through to a garden and stables, today converted into a car park and additional offices, with the rear of the house featuring an attractive veranda. The Flemish theme seen in the brick and gables of the exterior is continued inside, with dark, mahogony wood prevailing on staircases and window frames. All the original rooms are today used as offices, but the original features, marble fireplaces and painted ceilings, are still visible behind the desks, computers and photocopiers. It's an interesting 19th century dwelling, but with little exceptional on display.
Your paper, "CHINA'S ASCENT IN GLOBAL TRADE GOVERNANCE: FROM RULE TAKER TO RULE SHAKER, AND MAYBE RULE MAKER?", was recently listed on SSRN's Top Ten download list for Asian Law eJournal. As of 12/24/2011, your paper has been downloaded 42 times. You may view the abstract and download statistics at http://ssrn.com/abstract=1941771.
Simple examples of green behavior include bicycle commuting, backyard composting, driving a hybrid vehicle, shopping locally, or carrying a reusable water bottle instead of purchasing disposable bottles. These are simple, measureable, actions that anyone can do to promote a green lifestyle.
Minhao Zeng, University of Alberta. Examining Geocaching Practices Through a Mobilities Lens
I would have thought that went without saying; telling an inappropriate joke is a "foolish slip" - I think raping a young teenager falls into a slightly different category for most people.
A core difference between historicism and pseudo-historicism as I define them is that historicism is a method of explaining and evaluating that all humanistic scholars need to embrace as one tool among many in their bag of tricks, while pseudo-historicism is a universalizing fallacy all too common among humanisitic scholars. (103)
Black people can get sunburnt too, and are more likely to remember suncream.
The budget is the ideal price for making this project. We have to make song better than ours and others, and now we're also designing a T-shirt product that isn't merch.
believe the aim of politics is not self-aggrandisement or to profit
Block 15 Ferme De La' Ville Provision, 2011. I love this beer and wanted folks to try it while it was still fresh and bright. In my view, one of the best saison made, and the very vest made with wild yeast.
“What am I doing here,” he asks off stage. “I’m opening for Jimmy Kimmel and telling knock-knock jokes to Kim Kardashian.”
And to be honest. My hovering skills are getting better. As long as I remember to keep my control inputs small, smooth, and relatively slow, I can hover inside a 15ft circle and within 3 to 5 ft. of the ground. Then we went out and looked at power/collective settings for 60 kt cruise, 80 kt cruise, and climbs and descents at both air speeds as well. Then did an approach back to the airport to a spot landing, then he hovered over to the trailer and end of lesson. I still think he's suicidal and I'm pretty sure now that I can take the helicopter with me when I crash, rather than somehow killing myself as I walk up to the machine.
Maintain general purpose force (GPF) capability to do irregular warfare & counterinsurgency (IW/ COIN) by keeping Provincial Reconstruction Teams (PRT), Agro-Development Teams (ADT), and Human Terrain Teams (HTT) in our organization, possibly rolled up under Civil Affairs Brigades, or in a new organization that focuses solely on “nation-building” or “stability operations” (or whatever the term of the day is). This will allow us to maintain and apply the lessons learned over the last decade regarding small wars and whole-of-government approaches to civil-military operations (we can call it the Office/ Bureau/ Division of Strategic Assistance or something akin to that) and rotate military, government, and civilian/ corporate personnel through, sharing their insights and applying their experiences in nation-building & stability operations that we will likely be involved in despite our desire to avoid them. We saw this during the 1990s….a desire to avoid but constantly involved. Might as well be prepared to execute. Allies avec Advisors!!
Richard Bruehert, 38, Westbury, N.Y.
Western birthrates pale in comparison to Asian and African numbers and there is no evidence, despite claims to the contrary, that immigrants from those places typically adapt to Western levels of reproduction on arrival in Europe, Australia and America.
To be honest, I’ve never been comfortable with the label “kidney expert.” I’m just unfortunate enough to be a Chronic Kidney Disease patient. After this show, I realized how much I knew… and that only made me want to share the information even more.
As a kid, it was the coolest thing ever to have two weeks of snow days and then Christmas vacation. We made snow tunnels in our front yard that were 5 feet tall - you could stand up in them. The snow was heavy, so the tunnels didn't fall. We climbed on our roofs and jumped into our yards. We made snowmen until we were tired of snowmen and made forts and had awesome snowball fights.
with the fulfillment of the promise.
In the meantime here is one I can share. Our wedding colors were Aubergine and Coral! It went right along with the "Casual Elegance" theme of the weekend! In the weeks to come I will share the details of how we found our reception site, a place I truly fell in love with. It is an interior designers dream space!
I think I get so tired of asking him so often when he needs to go and stressing that he's going to have an accident when we're out that I've taken the easy option of putting him in Pull-Ups too often and now it's confused him.
Deputy Commandant for Aviation, Headquarters (’98-’01)
Speaking at the 42nd Anniversary of the American Indian Movement, during the weeklong conference, Whitehorse described her own journey, beginning with the exile of her people, the Navajo or Dine’.
To quickly summarise: one of the bloggers note that while talking about the corruption of Syed Abul Hossain or Nazmul Huda (both communication ministers, AL and BNP respectively), no one uses the salutations Janab / Sahib, but Suranjit Sengupta is frequently addressed as Sri / Babu, which has the effect of reminding people of the minister’s religion; and one of the commenters argued that Sri / Babu salutations aren’t necessarily communal, but reflect the general social manners.
As a refresher about what’s included in “total average circulation”:
and your seraphim heart is bleeding
And then yesterday we got the 3rd trailer. With more Bane (Tom Hardy) and more Catwoman (Anne Hathaway) and more John Blake (Jospeph Gordon-Levitt) on the screen.
4. Tools that (much like the elves surprised the shoemaker in the morning with assembled footwear) sharpen themselves overnight. A couple of out of work elves would do nicely. They can live under my bed between the fire escape ladder, rifle case, and Tyrannosaurus-sized dust bunnies. Cozy!
So I proceeded with popping the kernels, only to realize afterwards that I only had 1/2 cup of maple syrup left when the recipe calls for 1 1/2 cups. My only choice was to substitute the other cup with regular sugar...so much for making life easier.
Place fresh mango chunks in 8-inch square baking dish. Drizzle the mango with honey and mix with spoon. Place the dish in the oven and roast in the middle rack for 30 to 35 minutes. remove from the oven and let it cool. Once cooled, puree with lemon juice in the food processor until smooth. I ended up with about 8¼ oz of pureed mango.
When Abigail learns the truth, she and Jasper embark on a journey that will change both of their lives—and possibly the world…
Her plan of course was to climb a nearby tower and jump off, since in her mind, killing herself would give her a first class ticket to the Underworld. However, the unlikeliest of beings told that her plan was fucking stupid. Yes as the woodcut image above (Thankfully I found a lot of those for this blog) the tower itself spoke to her of the way down to Hades instead of letting her plummet to her death. Now with the directions to Hades, she made her way to it's cavern like entrance. (As for the tower, well that would be the later site for Pee Wee's Playhouse)
There are lots of ways to start locks. Basically if you convince Black hair to stay put long enough, it becomes locks on it's own. It can take 4-12 months before it will stay on it's own. I locked my hair, by corkscrewing it. When I undo it, it's curly for a couple of days.
How precious is thy steadfast love, O God!…They feast on the abundance of thy house, and thou givest them drink from the river of thy delights. For with thee is the fountain of life. — Psalm 36:7-9
I looked in the rear-view mirror. Her eyes were glistening. ‘I don’t have any family left,’ she continued in a soft voice.’The doctor says I don’t have very long.’ I quietly reached over and shut off the meter.
Brazil’s Congress set aside $282 million last year for the federal disaster-prevention program, a jump from the $236 million allotted in 2010. On orders of President Dilma Rousseff, government geologists drew up a list of cities at greatest risk for a natural disaster.
Leif let me know as soon as I got home from work yesterday and I was immediately back in those early days after George died. The despair, the chaos, the helplessness...I could easily imagine everything that these people are probably feeling. And I thought to myself when I heard the news, now they are some of our people- the parents of a dead baby. New members of one of the saddest clubs in existence.
"That's right ya young tearaway, I am indeed. Ya have heard of me have ya?"
Guinsoo: He hasn’t spoken a word since he appeared on the Summoner Showcase.
Funky Hand design and supply a fabulous range of digital papers, images and templates for crafting projects. Visit the Funky Hand website and you'll find the fabulous Papercraft Factory CDs and also, for instant gratification downloadable paper and digi image collections.
Also, Tiddly Inks is sponsoring the Cupcake Inspirations Challenge this week. Since it's anything goes here, why not follow the fabulous inspiration photo there and win twice!
It's been a long, long time since I've seen a Killdeer. Gulls, yes. Brown pelicans, yes. And more grackles than I care to count.
Corinne, you little diva you :)
Leftfield & John Lydon Open up UK
ABV=4.716%
So, for eight dollars, seventy-seven cents, and a trip to Lowe’s Home Center, I, single-handedly (o.k., so I used both hands) fixed the dripping water in the girls’ bathtub.
They did a whole battery of things: brain MRI, chest and abdominal CT scans, spinal tap, a myriad of blood tests, etc. Only to not be able to find out anything. Best guesses are that it is (a) maybe related to the emergency root canal I had right before the wedding that affected some nerves either at that time or (maybe more likely) in the healing process that followed, (b) maybe a virus, or (c) "idiopathic causes," which means they really have no idea and may never figure it out. I seemed to be getting a little better so they sent me home.
Ann has an amazing blog that I love to read. I learn so much from her blog but mostly she always makes me laugh. She and her hubby have built the most amazing family and the greatest kids. You can follow Ann's blog here.
I do enjoy the process of recycling as much as creating centerpieces..
If I walked out into the rain and got a bottle of Pepsi and a bucket of Kentucky.
We go on and on accumulating knowledge, identity, conditioning and this sense of 'Me' gets re-enforced over and over again. We develop an "Ego".
And then things
Gail: "It was on your shirt."
Nov 11 Baltimore, MD — The Hippodrome Theatre
The sky was too blue, too kind,
Here I have tossed some of the snow into a pile along the side of the driveway, edged by the neighbour's house. You can see the "smooth" bottom layer and the "chunky" top layer (yes, I thought of peanut butter, too). The smooth layer is where the snow fell, while the chunky is what was tossed on top from other parts of the driveway. The fallen snow layer is about 3" below Gio's shoulder, so one could estimate that there was about 16" of snow on the driveway. It wasn't consistently as thick across the whole driveway though, thanks to the wind.
Depression and suicide is the hardest things for me to think about it. The thought of losing anyone because it has been driven in their head that they are worthless or in a situation that they feel is inescapable really takes a tole on me emotionally.
When clothes were hung to dry.
Mr. Margaret Bassackwards: Well, it’s the school that confused her. She was quite on board with the whole thing, really. Then she started school. Quite confusing for her. People always correcting her, you know. Telling her, “No. He must be your dad and she must be your mom.” Like the child doesn’t know her mother from her father. Seems like no matter how many times I go in and explain, somebody is always confusing the child. Bunch of narrow minded bigots, really.
You're not planning to buy any more sewing machines, are you? (Often followed by a "no" and a shake of the head -- i.e., she has already answered the question the way she wants it answered. I attribute this to her being born during the Great Depression, but then so was Elizabeth Taylor and she certainly owned a lot of stuff.
(Debbie didn't nab ALL of them....)
First, Foucault describes hierarchical observations as a method whereas the architecture of schools, prisons, factories and monasteries were designed so that each person and their actions could be seen, or at least perceived as being seen (p. 173). The top of the hierarchical chain created a power mechanism to control the masses by creating the illusion that each layer of the hierarchy was overlooking the layer below so that even those supervising felt they were being observed (p. 177).
I figured I would use silk flowers for this since it was going outside. I also found a big hard wreath at the dollar tree. I figured that would be better too since it was going outside.
It's super-easy and soo wondefully tasty, you want to bake it again and again and again.
Essential Sites: The first five years of the band from 1977 to 1982 will comprise a good hunk, but certainly is not all of the important terrain that must be covered. “Live at The Witch Trials” is their first LP that was released in 1979 and has all of their classic ingredients. Ranting vocals from Smith combine with musician’s Bramah, Riley and Burns to ensure a guitar driven sound that was remarkably tight for the evolving punk rock landscape. Bassist Steve Hanley and guitarist Craig Scanlon enter in 1980 and in quick succession, “Grotesque (After the Gramme”), “Slates” and “Hex Enduction Hour” become a must-hear part of The Fall canon. The Hanley/Scanlon axis adds slashing guitar and bass to at-times venomous lyrics from Mark E. Smith (M.E.S.). “Totally Wired,” “N.W.R.A.” and “An Older Lover,” as well as “The Classical,” rank among the finest tracks they ever recorded. This period holds the essence of their organized cacophony that other bands have frequently imitated, but never succeeded in duplicating. That correct blend of riffs, minimalist freedom and bile could only be directed by one M.E.S.
“Why not, you can’t leave Amelia alone with your brother. He’s a cad.” And Dane just said they were cool?
Next on my agenda is to literally climb a tree just to kill an "ape man" and steal his bracelet, 'cause you know, that's just the kind of guy I am. Apparently.
Ta Parole est partage
Lt. Col. Dennis M. Johnson, 48, Port Edwards, Wis.
Scary!
As I watched one of my server's snack on the green olives while she helped me stock my garnish tray one night last week, I came to the realization that out of all my years of bartending, I've never tried a green olive. Not once. Not ever.
her audience, and it didn't spawn many chart-toppers.
dried cranberries (add at the end of cooking so they don't burn)
9 pm – 11 pm Film happening, “Being In The World” and Q & A following with Mark Wrathall (University of California, Riverside)
To make the whole story short: my husband had bought flight tickets for just the two of us and the children wanted to give them to me and wish me a nice weekend with their daddy. :-) My hubby had arranged everything. The children would be in good care and we for the first time would go on a trip just the two of us.
A morsel of dry earth falling
We can also show that just before the last State election, a period when Masing had been publicly cosying up to opposition figures, a mysterious and very large timber concession was issued to close associates of James Masing, authorising his known business partner to plunder 40,000 hectares of NCR land in the Meluan Entabai Area and the Julau/Pitoh Jiet Area.
The other day, on our banking website, I noticed it said that it would not be supporting Quicken 2009 after a certain date. I looked and saw that my Quicken was 2007. Wow, I really haven’t been keeping up with the new ones. Not that I ever needed anything like 2009 because I don’t tend to download anything from the internet onto my Quicken but instead just put in my own figures, trusting them more than some high school graduate entering figures as she/he tries to stay awake at the bank where they have a minimum paying job. But it occurred to both of us that maybe it was time to upgrade to a new Quicken. Not only will the banks stop supporting it but it has been our experience that the manufacture tends to stop supporting products after 3-5 years too (depending on the product) and anything that has now gone wrong with our Quicken is probably wrong to stay and won’t fix itself. AND it is now past lunch and what should have taken me 5 minutes has now taken me several hours and still isn’t working.
This dragon dance costume is electric luminous and can be played both at the daytime and at night, twice the use of the normal dragon. The LED lights are powered by normal batteries.
Maggie: "A Gamma hug." (repeatedly)
He could only utter one word: "Delicious."
But sin is sin. You can try to hide its ugliness by deflecting responsibility, but that doesn’t change the facts. And the fact is I chose to respond in anger last night. I didn’t have to do it. But I did. It was a voluntary decision that I made in my heart.
He sent the e-mail.
Her Grandfather was 10 years older than my Dad.They hadnt seen each since before the War.They simply lost touch.I knew nothing of them until 6 months before my dad died.Out of the blue they established contact via a few letters.Then My Dad died suddenly ..my Mum wrote to tell them.....Silence.We thought this strange...it was only later we found out that my Uncle had also died..within weeks of my dad's death.
I’ve said it before. This should have been a year long victory lap of Conservatives. Between the war in Afghanistan, the sluggish economy, high unemployment and the Supreme Court debate over health care, all Conservatives had to do was present someone intellighent, human and rational. Someone that Americans could see ‘felt their pain’.
They also have three locations listed with the Better Business Bureau:
As with all things, balance seems to be key. As a designer, how does one find the balance between over-designing a system, making it overly complex, and under-designing that same system, resulting in vagueness and lack of structure?!
Sending good thoughts to all my blog friends embarking on the A-Z Challenge. Have fun with it. I'll be visiting.
That's a lot of claim terms to chew over (and that's one of the broader claims), and pretty much all of the claims are in means-plus-function format. This is going to be an expensive case to litigate. Usually, companies like Toyota aren't all that interested in scorched-earth litigation, so I will predict here that this case will settle by this time next year . . .
15. Davis Bacon Act Certification
But, all this is contingent upon Diamond Aircraft’s obtaining full funding for the development program. That could be a $50-100 million challenge. BCA
I did this card for a challenge on:
Be deliberate and plan what you’ll do. I don’t spank when I’m angry, but if you do, then decide before hand how you’ll act when you get angry. That way, even if you act quickly, you’ve already given it the deliberation needed.
i think i'm taking more breaks than i am working...BUT, i have found an interesting bit of trivia...the google search that brings the most people to this blog: i'm free to do anything i want, any old time bet they're surprised when they land here!
Oh, it was a help because you can be identified by outsiders. We did get spat on a lot though.
I don’t know whether there is a “bureaucratic monstrosity” that left the kids without any means to get back home. The article simply doesn’t provide enough information but I would optimistically assume that there is a bus that is designated to their school and operates on the route that suits most of the kids in the area and is available for them to get back home. I would be outraged if the school doesn’t give the parents time and opportunity to arrange an alternative transport, but I doubt there is a school that would simply leave any kid without any means to get back home from one day to another without a single warning. But I can only guess as there is nothing further on this in the article.
I find this amazing! A young woman. Ancient Bethlehem. Unwed mother. They stoned women for such things in her day. But Mary believed in God. And submitted to His will. He gave her the Holy Spirit – the same Holy Spirit given to us. If He gave her confidence, He will give us confidence. Even though, like Mary, our situation seems impossible.
The report goes on to say that enterprises that currently host user-generated content could in the future become content service enterprises.
cupcake basics- sat 30th June- 9.30-3.30, $275
Sachiin has been in love with India’s favorite sport since he was a kid. He participated in the Celebrity Cricket League as a member of Sohail Khan’s Mumbai Heroes. He has also helped set up a cricket academy which funds and trains upcoming athletes. The IPL presents the perfect concoction of sports and entertainment.
Have decided to start on a large and exciting project - to make a wonderful large quilt using all my favourite and precious rare pieces of mid century modern fabrics that I've collected over the past ten years. (some 60s and 70s are slipping in too!)
Cover up. Mulch is the best winter protection for your plants. Wood mulch is the most common. Mulched leaves will also work. Wait until the ground has frozen slightly, usually around Thanksgiving for us, to ensure the plants are in their dormancy state. If the snow falls before you get the opportunity to get the job done, mulch over the snow. Some woody perennials and shrubs may benefit from soil mounded around the base. These plants, in our area include, roses, crape myrtle, butterfly bushes to name a few. Tender shrubs may need to be screened or wrapped with burlap or something similar, not plastic.
Me #2: Well. What are you waiting for? Begin.
Lever Release Ballhead DB-44LR
So now, our group is rallying around Tuesday who was diagnosed with cancer. She's in Stage 4 with Neuroblastoma. She's a very sick little girl and JK is asking for prayers. We're praying Tuesday gets well very soon. We're praying for Tuesday's twin sister, who is missing her sister. We're praying for her older brothers who miss their sister and their parents. And we're praying for JK and her husband to have strength, support and faith to get them through this difficult time.
--think:
The SG didn’t mention anything to me…
Timbaland-thieving electro pranksters throw all the sound effects they can afford at New Order's legacy. Their MySpace says they sound like "Party!". Succinct, but about right.
But God had a different plan...
I had to buy a book for my father to give his great-granddaughter-number-two for her birthday this week. In the bookshop, looking for something for a one year old, I thought of these books. I still have my "Splish Splash Rainy Day" with all the little fold pages. I loved opening those up and pretending it was a surprise each time I did it. In the bookshop I knew what sort of book I wanted to find. I knew what my father would want too.
If either Work is out of print and the Publisher receives from the Author a written request for a reversion of rights to such Work, the Publisher shall within four months of the Publisher's receipt of such request do one of the following: (i) announce that it will reissue an edition of such Work...(ii) enter a license providing for the publication in the United States of an edition of such Work...or (iii) revert in writing to the Author the rights to such Work granted to the Publisher in this Agreement...
Amazon, in other words, appears to be boldly breaching its contracts with these publishers. This is an exercise of brute economic power. Amazon knows it can largely dictate terms to non-Big Six publishers, and it badly wanted to launch this program with some notable titles.
the term’s started, a week has passed, nothing special
I don’t function well in this state, either. I get overwhelmed and quite moody and my head buzzes loudly until I make a change. I make change after change until it stops. These past few months I’ve said goodbye to some friends and loves, for a variety of reasons. A few quieted the buzzing, which is good. One goodbye created a louder buzz, a sure sign that it still distracts me.
When this happens, it is time to step away and re-orient myself to what is important about the trip. My “purpose” on this vacation is really no different from my purpose everyday, and that is to remember who I am, to remember that I am here to awaken to the Love that is inside me, to shine that light of Love, and to look for it in all that I meet in this great trip called Life.
At the time, Amazon and Macmillan were scrapping over which firm would set the price for Macmillan’s e-books. Amazon wanted to price every Macmillan e-book, and indeed every e-book of every publisher, at $9.99 or less. This scorched-earth tactic, which guaranteed that Amazon lost money on many of the e-books it sold, was designed to cement the online retailer’s dominance in the nascent market. It also had the effect of persuading customers that this deeply discounted price, which publishers considered ruinously low, was the “natural” one for an e-book.
Stay tuned for the new challenge coming up this week hosted by Shel and her mom!
can be easily substantiated. No other serious book, for example, examines the background, context, significance and consequences of Lloyd-Jones’s 1966 address in such detail or depth as Murray does in this second volume. Earlier chapters such as Unity: Ecumenical or Evangelical (pp. 427-450), Conversations and Journeys (pp. 453-471), Cross-Winds (pp. 472-492) and 1965:The Approaching Crisis (pp. 495-511) are well researched and they are invaluable in providing a meaningful background to the three crucial chapters dealing with 1966 and the assessment of the controversy.29
Meanwhile, in a move that will surely give a significant boost to Liverpool’s hopes of regaining their status as the biggest club on Merseyside, Dirk Kuyt looks to be on his merry way to the Free and Hanseatic City of Hamburg. Kuyt has a year left on his contract with Liverpool but the Dutchman is set to be swooned by the bleached-bearded Lothario that is Thorsten Fink, a man who looks like he spends his weekends in front of a wind machine recreating classic Take That videos wearing nothing more than a pair of dungarees and a I-can’t-believe-this-has-ended-like-this-when-we-had-so-much-going-for-us look. “He has class, and he is also a fighter. There is nothing more that needs to be said about the quality of this player,” alleged Fink of Kuyt. More good news for L iverpool fans comes in the form of the imminent signing of Clearasil-skinned striker Luuk de Jong.
After that – what? they want to place me in jail because of the reporting on the observations of their non-confirmation of the – what?? – unconfirmed fact of them actually acting – it would at the very least verify that they are – if you cannot see that that is the justice system setting itself up with a (An illegal) backdoor to further attempting to exercise – undue & unwarranted – control – over a VICTIM in a case – furthering the victimization of the victim that they are already victimizing by this kind of manner – WOW! & YIKES!
Never have so many people lived in dismal shanty towns in South Africa as are now: more than 50% of the entire population is unemployed and homeless now.
The only way we could afford to give away a pair of shoes was if our customers became our marketers. So if you bought a pair and told someone, then they told someone, then someone wrote an article about it, and a hundred people read it and so forth . . .that’s really the only way this model could work, and that’s how it’s worked so far.
Have fun, these are really easy just a bit time consuming.
Then...a miracle...out of the corner of my eye, I see my friends family walked into the pub. I excused myself saying that I needed to use the bathroom - but really, this was my grand escape. I casually grabbed a $20 out of my purse and laid it on the table, which was much more than the drink I ordered and headed over to where my friend's parents were. Naturally, they told me that I could stay with them until my date left, which incidentally took 20 minutes! Yes, HE SAT THERE FOR 20 minutes!!!!! And then I think he got the hint...
to get the 'playing live' thing out of my system.
